CIK: 1093557
Company Name: DEXCOM INC
Form Type : 10-K
Filing Date: 2019-02-21
Accession Number: 0001093557-19-000041


ITEM 1 BUSINESS Overview We are a medical device company primarily focused on the design, development and commercialization of continuous glucose monitoring, or CGM, systems for use by people with diabetes and by healthcare providers. We received approval from the United States (U.S.) Food and Drug Administration, or FDA, and commercialized our first product in 2006. We launched our latest generation system, the DexCom G6 integrated Continuous Glucose Monitoring System, or G6, in 2018. Unless the context requires otherwise, the terms we, us, our, the company, or DexCom refer to DexCom, Inc. and its subsidiaries. Products DexCom G6 In March 2018, we obtained marketing authorization from the FDA for the G6 via the de novo process. The G6 is the first type of continuous glucose monitoring system permitted by the FDA to be used as part of an integrated system with other compatible medical devices and electronic interfaces, which may include automated insulin dosing systems, insulin pumps, blood glucose meters or other electronic devices used for diabetes management. G6 and substantially equivalent devices of this generic type that may later receive marketing authorization are referred to as integrated continuous glucose monitoring systems or iCGMs, and have been classified as Class II devices. Along with this classification, the FDA established criteria, called special controls, which outline requirements for assuring CGM accuracy, reliability and clinical relevance, and which also describe the type of studies and data required to demonstrate acceptable CGM performance. The G6 is designed to allow our transmitter to run an algorithm to generate a glucose value and to communicate directly to a patient compatible mobile device, including iPh1 , iPod touch , iPad , and certain Android mobile devices. A patient glucose data can also be displayed on wearable devices, like the Apple Watch and Wear OS by Google devices. The G6 transmitter has a labeled useful life of 3 months. Data from the G6 can be integrated with DexCom CLARITY , our cloud based reporting software, for personalized, easy to understand analysis of trends that may improve diabetes management. In June 2018, we received Conformit Europ enne Marking, or CE Mark, approval for the G6, which allows us to market the system in the European Union and the countries in Asia and Latin America that recognize the CE Mark, as well as New Zealand (subject to compliance with certain local administrative requirements) though certain countries may require additional marketing authorizations (for example, the inclusion of medical devices on the Australian Register of Therapeutic Goods in Australia). The sensor is inserted by the user and is intended to be used continuously for up to ten days, after which it may be replaced with a new disposable sensor. Our transmitter is reusable until it reaches the end of its use life. Our receiver is also reusable. As we establish an installed base of customers using our products, we expect to generate an increasing portion of our revenues through recurring sales of our disposable sensors. 3 The G6 carries forward important features of prior generation DexCom CGM systems Continuous glucose readings. Automatically sends glucose readings to a DexCom receiver or compatible mobile device every five minutes. Mobile app and sharing. Compatibility with mobile device applications allows for sharing glucose information with up to five people for added support. Customizable alarms and alerts. Personalized alert schedule immediately warns the user of pending dangerous high and low blood sugars. Third party reimbursement. In the United States, the G6 is covered by those commercial insurers that reimburse for the G5 Mobile, as well as Medicare. The G6 also has a number of new or improved features compared to our prior generation devices Finger stick elimination. No finger sticks are needed for calibration or diabetes treatment decisions, consistent with the instructions for use. Easy sensor application. Complete redesign of the sensor applicator allows for 1 touch, simple insertion. Discreet and low profile. A redesigned transmitter with a 28% lower profile than the previous generation DexCom CGM makes the device comfortable and easy to wear under clothing. Medication blocking. New feature allows for more accurate glucose readings without interference from medications taken at typical indication doses, such as acetaminophen. Predictive low alert. New alert feature intended to predict hypoglycemia before it hits to help avoid dangerous low blood sugar events. Extended 10 day sensor. 10 day sensor allows for 43% longer wear than previous generation DexCom CGMs. Except with respect to the foregoing, the G6 is equivalent to our prior generation CGM systems in its technical capabilities and its indications, except that since the G6 is classified by the FDA as a Class II device, it is subject to special controls and modifications of or revisions to the device may be made under the 510(k) process. DexCom G5 Mobile In August 2015, we received approval from the FDA for the DexCom G5 Mobile Continuous Glucose Monitoring System, also referred to as the G5 Mobile. The G5 Mobile is designed to allow our transmitter to run the Software 505 algorithm, and to communicate directly to a patient compatible mobile device, including iPh1, iPod touch, iPad, and certain Android mobile devices. The G5 Mobile transmitter has a labeled useful life of 3 months. Data from the G5 Mobile can be integrated with DexCom CLARITY. In September 2015, we launched the G5 Mobile in certain countries in Europe. Similar to the G6, the disposable sensor is inserted by the user and is intended to be used continuously for up to seven days, after which it may be replaced with a new sensor. The related transmitter is reusable until it reaches the end of its use life, and the related receiver is also reusable. In December 2016, the FDA approved the G5 Mobile as the first CGM system in the United States to have a non adjunctive indication. The non adjunctive indication expands the lawfully permitted use of the G5 Mobile as a replacement to finger stick glucose testing for diabetes treatment decisions. With the new label indication, the G5 Mobile only requires 2 finger sticks per day for calibration. In the countries and regions outside of the United States that recognize the CE Mark, as well as the United States and Canada, the G5 Mobile also does not require confirmatory finger sticks when making treatment decisions, although a minimum of 2 finger sticks a day remain necessary for calibration. Approval of the non adjunctive indication also was an important and necessary step in enabling people with Medicare to access CGM. Except with respect to the foregoing, the G5 Mobile is functionally equivalent to our earlier generation CGM systems in its technical capabilities and its regulatory requirements and indications. DexCom G4 PLATINUM The DexCom G4 PLATINUM CGM system, or G4 PLATINUM, replaced our DexCom SEVEN PLUS system beginning in 2012, when it was approved for up to seven days of continuous use by adults with diabetes. Since 2012, we have marketed the G4 PLATINUM under a CE Mark in the European Union, the countries in Asia and Latin America that recognize the CE Mark, New Zealand and Australia, and in the United States with approval from the FDA. We received approvals for a pediatric indication under the CE Mark in February 2013 and from the FDA in February 2014, enabling us to market and sell this system to persons 2 years old and older who have diabetes. In June 2014, we received approval 4 from the FDA for an expanded indication for the G4 PLATINUM for professional use, which allows healthcare professionals to purchase the G4 PLATINUM system for use with multiple patients. Healthcare professionals can use the insights gained from a G4 PLATINUM professional session to adjust therapy and to educate and motivate patients to modify their behavior after viewing the effects that specific foods, exercise, stress and medications have on their glucose levels. In October 2014, we launched our Software 505 algorithm for the G4 PLATINUM, an algorithm which enabled our systems to achieve a single digit MARD a measure of the accuracy of continuous glucose monitoring. DexCom Share In 2015, we received approval from the FDA for the G4 PLATINUM with DexCom Share, or Share, and began commercializing this product in the United States in the first quarter of 2015 using a secure wireless connection between a patient G4 PLATINUM receiver and an app. We now offer this feature through the G6 and the G5 Mobile apps as well as the Share2 app, which works with the G4 PLATINUM receiver with Share. The Share remote monitoring system uses an app on the patient iPh1, iPod touch, iPad or Android mobile device to transmit glucose information to the cloud and then to apps on the mobile devices of up to five designated recipients, or followers, who can remotely monitor a patient glucose information and receive alert notifications anywhere they have an Internet or cellular connection. A patient glucose data can also be displayed on a patient or follower wearable device, such as the Apple Watch and Wear OS by Google devices, when used in conjunction with the patient or follower iPh1 or Android mobile device. Data and Insulin Delivery Collaborations We have entered into multiple collaboration agreements that leverage our technology platform to integrate our continuous glucose monitoring products with insulin delivery systems. The general purpose of these development and commercial relationships is to integrate our technology into the insulin pump or pen product offerings of the respective partner, enabling the partner insulin delivery device to receive and display glucose readings from our transmitter and, in some cases, use the glucose readings for semi automated insulin delivery. Currently, we have announced significant insulin delivery partnerships with Eli Lilly, Insulet, Novo Nordisk and Tandem Diabetes. In addition to these major partners, we are working with other companies that are pursuing varying strategies surrounding semi automated insulin delivery and data analytics to improve outcomes and ease of use in diabetes management. Verily Collaboration On November 20, 2018, we entered into an Amended and Restated Collaboration and License Agreement with Verily Life Sciences LLC (an Alphabet Company) and Verily Ireland Limited (collectively, Verily), which we refer to as the Restated Collaboration Agreement. This replaced our original Collaboration and License Agreement with Verily from August 2015, as amended in October 2016, and eliminated any future royalty obligations under the original agreement. Pursuant to the Restated Collaboration Agreement, we and Verily have agreed to continue to jointly develop a certain next generation CGM product, and potentially 1 or more additional CGM products, for which we will have exclusive commercialization rights. The Restated Collaboration Agreement also provides us with an exclusive license to use intellectual property of Verily resulting from the collaboration, and certain Verily patents, in the development, manufacture and commercialization of blood based or interstitial glucose monitoring products more generally (subject to certain exclusions, which are outside the CGM field as it is commonly understood). It also provides us with non exclusive license rights under Verily other intellectual property rights to develop, manufacture, and commercialize those kinds of glucose monitoring products and certain CGM product companion software functionalities. The Restated Collaboration Agreement requires us to use commercially reasonable efforts to develop, launch, and commercialize the CGM product(s) that are the subject of the collaboration according to certain timing and other objectives, and provides for 1 executive sponsor from each of us and Verily to meet periodically and make decisions related to the collaboration (within a limited scope of authority) by consensus. In consideration of Verily performance of its obligations under the joint development plan of the Restated Collaboration Agreement, the licenses granted to us and the amendment of the original agreement, we made an upfront payment, and will make potential future milest1 and incentive payments upon the achievement of certain goals, as follows On December 28, 2018, we made an initial payment of $250 million in shares of our common stock, calculated under the Restated Collaboration Agreement to be 1,840,943 shares of our common stock, allocated between Verily and Onduo, LLC, subject to certain transfer restrictions. Additional milest1 payments of up to $275 million may become due and payable by us upon the achievement of future product regulatory approval and revenue milest1s. At our election, we may make these milest1 5 payments in shares of our common stock, also allocated between Verily and Onduo, LLC, with the number of shares being calculated based on the same share value that was used for purposes of the initial payment, adjusted for stock splits, dividends, and the like, subject to customary closing conditions, including any required antitrust approvals applicable to the issuance of such shares. Alternatively, at our election, we may make any of these milest1 payments in cash. Any such cash payment would be equal to the number of shares that would otherwise be issued for the given milest1 payment (calculated as described above) multiplied by the value of our stock on the date the relevant milest1 is achieved, adjusted for stock splits, dividends, and the like. An additional payment of up to $5 million will become due and payable by us as an incentive payment if Verily completes its development obligations at least thirty days before an agreed upon deadline. Future Products We plan to develop future generations of technologies focused on improved performance and convenience and that will enable intelligent insulin administration. We also are aggressively exploring how to extend our offerings to other opportunities, including for people with Type 2 diabetes that are non insulin using, people with pre diabetes, people who are obese, people with gestational diabetes and in the hospital setting. We will continue to develop a ne2rked platform with open architecture, connectivity and transmitters capable of communicating with other devices and software systems. We also intend to expand our efforts to accumulate CGM patient data and metrics and apply predictive modeling and machine learning to generate interactive CGM insights that can inform patient behavior. Our product development timelines depend on our ability to achieve clinical endpoints, regulatory and legal requirements and to overcome technology challenges. Product development timelines may be delayed due to extended regulatory approval timelines, scheduling issues with patients and investigators, requests from institutional review boards, sensor performance and manufacturing supply constraints, among other factors. In addition, support of these clinical trials requires significant resources from employees involved in the production of our products, including research and development, manufacturing, quality assurance, and clinical and regulatory personnel. Even if our development and clinical trial efforts are successful, the FDA may not approve, clear or otherwise authorize our products, and even if authorized, we may not achieve acceptance in the marketplace by physicians and people with diabetes. Background Diabetes is a disease with significant adverse consequences for human health throughout the world. The International Diabetes Federation, or IDF , estimates that in 2017, 425 million people around the world had diabetes, and the Centers for Disease Control, or CDC , estimates that in 2017, diabetes affected 30.3 million people in the United States, of which 7.2 million were undiagnosed. IDF estimates that by 2045, the worldwide incidence of people suffering from diabetes will reach 629 million. According to the CDC s National Vital Statistics Reports for 2015, diabetes was the seventh leading cause of death by disease in the United States. According to the Congressional Diabetes Caucus website, diabetes is the leading cause of kidney failure, adult onset blindness, lower limb amputations, and significant cause of heart disease and stroke, high blood pressure and nerve damage. According to the IDF , there were an estimated 4 million deaths attributable to diabetes globally in 2017 between the ages of 20 and 79 years. The American Diabetes Association, or ADA , Fast Facts, revised in August 2017, states that diabetes is the primary cause of death for more than 80,000 Americans each year, and contributes to the death of more than 250,000 Americans annually. According to an article published in The New England Journal of Medicine in November 2014, excess mortality for people with diabetes with ages of less than 30 years is largely explained by acute complications of diabetes. Among people of all ages, 2017 data indicated the following An estimated 24.7 million people or 7.6% of the U.S. population had been diagnosed with diabetes. In addition to those newly diagnosed, the Congressional Diabetes Caucus website reports that every 24 hours there are 238 amputations in people with diabetes, 120 people who enter end stage kidney disease programs, and 48 people who go blind. According to the ADA , 1 in every four healthcare dollars was spent on treating people with diabetes in 2017, and the direct medical costs and indirect expenditures attributable to diabetes in the United States were an estimated $327 billion, an inflation adjusted increase of approximately 26% since 2012 Of the $327 billion in overall expenses, the ADA estimated that approximately $237 billion were direct costs associated with diabetes care, chronic complications and excess general medical costs, and $90 billion were indirect costs. The ADA also found that average medical expenditures among people with diagnosed diabetes were 23 times higher than for people without diabetes in 2017. According to the IDF , 2017 expenditures attributable to diabetes were estimated to be $727 billion globally. The IDF estimates that expenditures attributable to diabetes will grow to $776 billion globally by 2045. 6 Continuous Glucose Monitoring We believe continuous glucose monitoring has the potential to enable more people with diabetes to achieve and sustain tight glycemic control. The landmark 1993 Diabetes Control and Complications Trial , or DCCT, demonstrated that improving blood glucose control lowers the risk of developing diabetes related complications by up to 50%. The study also demonstrated that people with Type 1 diabetes achieved sustained benefits with intensive management. Yet, according to an article published in the Journal of the American Medical Association in 2004, less than 50% of diabetes patients were meeting ADA standards for glucose control (A1c), and only 37% of people with diabetes were achieving their glycemic targets. According to an article published in The New England Journal of Medicine in November 2014, in 2 national registries, only 13% to 15% of people with diabetes met treatment guidelines for good glycemic control, and more than 20% had very poor glycemic control. The CDC estimated that as of 2010, 636% of all adults with diabetes were monitoring their blood glucose levels on a daily basis, with a substantially higher percentage for insulin requiring patients. Various clinical studies also demonstrate the benefits of continuous glucose monitoring and that continuous glucose monitoring is equally effective in patients who administer insulin through multiple daily injections or through use of continuous subcutaneous insulin infusion pumps. Results of a Juvenile Diabetes Research Foundation, or JDRF , study published in the New England Journal of Medicine in 2008, and the extension phase of the study, published in Diabetes Care in 2009, demonstrated that continuous glucose monitoring improved A1c levels and reduced incidence of hypoglycemia for patients over the age of 25 and for all patients of all ages who utilized continuous glucose monitoring regularly. In 2016, the first and only randomized, controlled study focusing solely on the benefit of continuous glucose monitoring for diabetes patients using multiple daily injections, or MDI, insulin therapy showed DexCom CGM System users on MDI achieved a 1 percent average A1c reduction after 24 weeks of regular use, compared to their baseline. Study participants also increased time spent in their target A1c range and spent less time in hypoglycemia and hyperglycemia when they used a DexCom CGM System compared to those who used only a standard blood glucose meter to monitor their glucose. This DIaMonD (Multiple Daily Injections and Continuous Glucose Monitoring in Diabetes) study is the first of its kind in demonstrating the impact of CGM only, without insulin pumps or other therapeutic interventions, on A1c and hypoglycemia in participants using a multiple daily injection insulin regimen. Our current target market consists primarily of people with Type 1 and Type 2 diabetes who utilize insulin pump therapy or who utilize multiple daily insulin injections. We have recently begun to target people with Type 2 diabetes on multiple daily injection therapy and expect to expand our target market to include all people with diabetes, people with pre diabetes and people who are obese. Although the majority of our revenue has been generated in the United States, we have expanded our operations to include Canada, Australia, New Zealand, and certain countries in Europe, Asia, the Middle East, Latin America and Africa. Commercial Operations We have built a direct sales organization in the United States, Canada and certain countries in Europe to call on endocrinologists, physicians and diabetes educators who can educate and influence patient adoption of continuous glucose monitoring. We believe that focusing efforts on these participants is important given the instrumental role they each play in the decision making process for diabetes therapy. To complement our direct sales efforts, we have entered into distribution arrangements in the United States and internationally that allow distributors to sell our products. We believe our direct, highly specialized and focused sales organization and our domestic and international distribution agreements are sufficient for us to support our sales efforts for at least the next twelve months. Product revenues are generated from the sale of durable continuous glucose monitoring systems (receivers and transmitters) and disposable sensors through a direct sales force in the United States, the United Kingdom, Germany, Switzerland, Austria and Canada as well as through distribution arrangements in the United States, Canada, Australia, New Zealand, and certain countries in Europe, Asia, Latin America, the Middle East and Africa. Market Opportunity Diabetes Diabetes is a chronic, life threatening disease for which there is no known cure. The disease is caused by the body inability to produce or effectively utilize the horm1 insulin. This inability prevents the body from adequately regulating blood glucose levels. Glucose, the primary source of energy for cells, must be maintained at certain concentrations in the blood in order to permit optimal cell function and health. Normally, the pancreas provides control of blood glucose levels by secreting the horm1 insulin to decrease blood glucose levels when concentrations are too high. In people with diabetes, the body does not produce sufficient levels of insulin, or fails to utilize insulin effectively, causing blood glucose levels to rise above normal. This condition is called hyperglycemia and often results in acute complications as well as 7 chronic long term complications such as heart disease, limb amputations, loss of kidney function and blindness. When blood glucose levels are high, people with diabetes often administer insulin in an effort to decrease blood glucose levels. Unfortunately, insulin administration can drive blood glucose levels below the normal range, resulting in hypoglycemia. In cases of severe hypoglycemia, people with diabetes risk acute complications, such as loss of consciousness or death. Due to the drastic nature of acute complications associated with hypoglycemia, many people with diabetes are reluctant to reduce blood glucose levels. Consequently, these individuals often remain in a hyperglycemic state, increasing their odds of developing long term chronic complications. Diabetes is typically classified into 2 major groups Type 1 and Type 2 Type 1 Diabetes According to the ADA and JDRF, as of 2012 there were an estimated 13 million people with Type 1 diabetes in the United States. Type 1 diabetes is an autoimmune disorder that usually develops during childhood and is characterized by an absence of insulin, resulting from destruction of the insulin producing cells of the pancreas. Individuals with Type 1 diabetes must rely on frequent insulin injections in order to regulate and maintain blood glucose levels. According to JDRF, 40,000 people are diagnosed with Type 1 diabetes each year in the United States and between the years 2001 and 2009 there was a 21% increase in the prevalence of Type 1 diabetes in people under the age of 20. In addition, according to the National Diabetes Statistics Report in 2009, there were an estimated 18,436 people younger than the age of 20 years old were diagnosed with Type 1 diabetes in the United States. Type 2 Diabetes According to the ADA, in 2012 there were approximately 27.8 million people in the United States with Type 2 diabetes. Type 2 diabetes is a metabolic disorder which results when the body is unable to produce sufficient amounts of insulin or becomes insulin resistant. Depending on the severity of Type 2 diabetes, individuals may require diet and nutrition management, exercise, oral medications or insulin injections to regulate blood glucose levels. We estimate that approximately 6.0 million Type 2 patients must use insulin to manage their diabetes. Type 2 diabetes is occurring with increasing frequency in young people, with the increase in prevalence related to an increase in obesity amongst children. According to the CDC, as of 2016, approximately 18.5% of children and adolescents aged 2 19 years, or 137 million children, in the United States were obese. Childhood obesity has more than doubled in children and quadrupled in adolescents in the past 30 years. Diabetes and Glucose Management in the Hospital Setting There are various subgroups of people with diabetes, including in hospital patients, who present significant management challenges. According to the ADA, diabetes related inpatient hospitalizations totaled 40.3 million days and 222 million outpatient visits in 2017, with outpatient visits increasing 48% since 2012 Additionally, market research shows that over 16 million patients are admitted with hyperglycemia prior to elective surgery, which results in delays and increased length of stay. Once admitted, studies conducted by Hospital Health Ne2rk in 2013 and AACE in 2011 suggest that approximately 28% of patients experience hyperglycemia and 5% of patients experience hypoglycemia, both of which are preventable. After discharge, patients who experienced hyperglycemia or hypoglycemia in the hospital have a higher rate of readmission within 30 days. Approximately 30% of all health care expenditures incurred by people with diabetes come from higher rates of hospital admission and longer average lengths of stay per admission, constituting the single largest contributor to the medical cost of diabetes. Of the projected $486 billion in national expenditures for hospital inpatient care in 2017, approximately $123 billion is incurred by people who have diabetes, of which $70 billion is directly attributed to their diabetes. Importance of Glucose Monitoring Blood glucose levels can be affected by many factors, including the carbohydrate and fat content of meals, exercise, stress, illness or impending illness, hormonal releases, variability in insulin absorption and changes in the effects of insulin in the body. Given the many factors that affect blood glucose levels, maintaining glucose within a normal range is difficult, resulting in frequent and unpredictable excursions above or below normal blood glucose levels. People with diabetes administer insulin or ingest carbohydrates throughout the day in order to maintain blood glucose levels within normal ranges. People with diabetes frequently overcorrect and fluctuate between hyperglycemic and hypoglycemic states, often multiple times during the same day. As a result, many people with diabetes are routinely outside the normal blood glucose range. People with diabetes are often unaware that their glucose levels are either too high or too low, and their inability to completely control blood glucose levels and the associated serious complications can be frustrating and, at times, overwhelming. 8 In an attempt to maintain blood glucose levels within the normal range, people with diabetes must first measure their blood glucose levels. Often after measuring their blood glucose levels, people with diabetes make therapeutic adjustments. As adjustments are made, additional blood glucose measurements may be necessary to gauge the individual response to the adjustments. More frequent testing of blood glucose levels provides people with diabetes with information that can be used to better understand and manage their diabetes. The ADA recommends that most people with Type 1 diabetes test their blood glucose levels at least 3 or more times per day, and that significantly more frequent testing may be required to reach A1c targets safely without hypoglycemia. Clinical outcomes data support the notion that an important comp1nt of effective diabetes management is frequent monitoring of blood glucose levels. The landmark 1993 DCCT consisting of patients with Type 1 diabetes, and the 1998 UK Prospective Diabetes Study, consisting of patients with Type 2 diabetes, demonstrated that people with diabetes who intensely managed blood glucose levels delayed the onset and slowed the progression of diabetes related complications. The DCCT demonstrated that intensive management reduced the risk of complications by 76% for eye disease, 60% for nerve disease and 50% for kidney disease, but also found that it led to a 3 fold increase in the frequency of hypoglycemic events. In the December 2005 edition of the New England Journal of Medicine , the authors of a peer reviewed study concluded that intensive diabetes therapy has long term beneficial effects on the risk of cardiovascular disease in patients with Type 1 diabetes. The study showed that intensive diabetes therapy reduced the risk of cardiovascular disease by 42% and the risk of non fatal heart attack, stroke or death from cardiovascular disease by 57%. Limitations of Existing Glucose Monitoring Products Single point finger stick devices are the most prevalent devices for glucose monitoring. These devices require taking a blood sample with a finger stick, placing a drop of blood on a test strip and inserting the strip into a glucose meter that yields a single point in time blood glucose measurement. We believe that these devices suffer from several limitations, including Limited Information. Even if people with diabetes test several times each day, each measurement represents a single blood glucose value at a single point in time. Given the many factors that can affect blood glucose levels, excursions above and below the normal range often occur between these discrete measurement points in time. Without the ability to determine whether their blood glucose level is rising, falling or holding constant, and the rate at which their blood glucose level is changing, the individual ability to effectively manage and maintain blood glucose levels within normal ranges is severely limited. Further, people with diabetes cannot test themselves during sleep, when the risk of hypoglycemia is significantly increased. The following graph shows the limited information provided by four single point measurements during a single day using a traditional single point finger stick device, compared to the data provided by our continuous sensor. The data presented in the graph is from a clinical trial we completed in 2003 with a continuous glucose monitoring system, where the patient was blinded to the continuous glucose data. The continuous data indicates that, even with four finger sticks in 1 day, the patient blood glucose levels were above the target range of 80 140 milligrams per deciliter ( mg dl ) for a period of 135 hours. 9 Single Day Continuous Data Inconvenience. The process of measuring blood glucose levels with single point finger stick devices can cause significant disruption in the daily activities of people with diabetes and their families. People with diabetes using single point finger stick devices must stop whatever they are doing several times per day, self inflict a painful prick and draw blood to measure blood glucose levels. To do so, people with diabetes must always carry a fully supplied kit that may include a spring loaded needle, or lancet, disposable test strips, cleansing wipes and the meter, and then safely dispose of the used supplies. This process is inconvenient and may cause uneasiness in social situations. Difficulty of Use. To obtain a sample with single point finger stick devices, people with diabetes generally prick 1 of their fingertips or, occasionally, a forearm with a lancet. They then squeeze the area to produce the blood sample and another prick may be required if a sufficient volume of blood is not obtained the first time. The blood sample is then placed on a disposable test strip that is inserted into a blood glucose meter. This task can be difficult for individuals with decreased tactile sensation and visual acuity, which are common complications of diabetes. Pain. Although the fingertips are rich in blood flow and provide a good site to obtain a blood sample, they are also densely populated with highly sensitive nerve endings. This makes the lancing and subsequent manipulation of the finger to draw blood painful. The pain and discomfort are compounded by the fact that fingers offer limited surface area, so tests are often performed on areas that are sore from prior tests. People with diabetes may also suffer pain when the finger prick site is disturbed during regular activities. The DexCom Solution Our G4 PLATINUM, G5 Mobile and G6 systems offer the following advantages to people with diabetes Improved Outcomes. Results of a major multicenter clinical trial funded by the JDRF demonstrated that patients with Type 1 diabetes who used continuous glucose monitoring devices to help manage their disease experienced significant improvements in glucose control. Data published in a peer reviewed article based on the pivotal trial for our first generation system demonstrated that patients using the system showed statistically significant improvements in glucose levels within the target range when compared to patients relying solely on single point finger stick measurements. Additional peer reviewed published data has demonstrated that patients with access to seven days of continuous glucose data statistically improved glucose control by further increasing their time spent 10 with glucose levels in the target range, thereby reducing time spent in both hyperglycemic and hypoglycemic ranges. Finally, peer reviewed data published from the DIaMonD study demonstrated that DexCom CGM System users on MDI (multiple daily injections) achieved a 1 percent average reduction in hemoglobin A1c levels, a measure of the average amount of glucose in the blood over the prior 3 months, after 24 weeks of regular use, compared to their baseline. Study participants also increased time spent in their target A1c range and spent less time in hypoglycemia and hyperglycemia when they used a DexCom CGM system compared to those who used only a standard blood glucose meter to monitor their glucose. Access to Real Time Values, Trend Information and Alerts. At their fingertips, people with diabetes can view their current glucose value, along with a graphical display of the historical trend information on our receiver or alternate display device. Without continuous monitoring, the individual is often unaware if his or her glucose is rising, declining or remaining constant. Access to continuous real time glucose measurements provides people with diabetes information that may aid in attaining better glucose control. Additionally, our G4 PLATINUM, G5 Mobile and G6 systems alert people with diabetes when their glucose levels approach inappropriately high or low levels so that they may intervene. Intuitive User Interface. We have developed a user interface that we believe is intuitive and easy to use. The G5 Mobile and G6 receiver are compact with an easy to read color display, simple navigation tools, audible alerts and graphical display of trend information. Similar benefits are available via the interfaces we have made available on compatible mobile devices. These devices can serve as substitutes for our receivers or alternate display units in certain geographies. Convenience and Comfort. Our G4 PLATINUM, G5 Mobile and G6 systems provide people with diabetes with the benefits of continuous monitoring, without having to perform finger stick tests for every measurement. Additionally, the disposable sensor that is inserted under the skin is a very thin wire, minimizing potential discomfort associated with inserting or wearing the disposable sensor. The external portion of the sensor, attached to the transmitter, is small, has a low profile and is designed to be easily worn under clothing. The wireless receiver is the size of a small smart ph1 and can be carried discreetly in a pocket or purse. We believe that convenience is an important factor in achieving widespread adoption of a continuous glucose monitoring system. Connectivity to Wearables and Others. Patients can monitor their glucose levels and trends on compatible wearable devices, such as Apple Watch and Wear OS by Google devices, when used with a compatible mobile device. Also, our Share remote monitoring systems enable users of our G4 PLATINUM with Share, G5 Mobile and G6 systems to have their sensor glucose information remotely monitored by their family, friends or designated recipient, or follower, by wirelessly transmitting data from the user smart ph1 to the cloud and then to the follower mobile device. Up to five followers can remotely monitor a patient glucose information and receive secondary alert notifications from almost anywhere with an Internet connection via each follower mobile device. While we believe the G4 PLATINUM, G5 Mobile and G6 systems offer these advantages, people with diabetes may not perceive the benefits of continuous glucose monitoring and may be unwilling to change their current treatment regimens. Furthermore, our G4 PLATINUM, G5 Mobile and G6 systems are only available by prescription in the United States and may not appeal to all types of people with diabetes. Many international jurisdictions do not require a prescription for the dispensing of a specific device to a patient, however, the device must have received necessary regulatory approvals (e.g., Australia, Singapore and Germany). In the United Kingdom, CGMs and most related supplies are issued pursuant to a prescription; however, prescriptions are free for residents of England, Scotland, Wales and Northern Ireland under the National Health System. The G4 PLATINUM and G5 Mobile systems prompt the user to replace the sensor no later than the seventh day, and the G6 prompts the user to replace the sensor no later than the tenth day; although we are aware of reports from the field that some individuals have been able to use sensors for longer periods. People with diabetes could find this process to be uncomfortable or inconvenient, and may be unwilling to insert a disposable sensor in their body, especially if their current diabetes management involves no more than 2 finger sticks per day. The G4 PLATINUM is not indicated as a replacement device for single point finger stick devices in the United States, must be calibrated initially using measurements from 2 single point finger stick tests and thereafter at least every 12 hours using single point finger stick tests, and may be more costly to use than other glucose measurement devices. In the United States, Canada and the countries and regions outside of the United States that recognize the CE Mark, our G5 Mobile system no longer requires confirmatory finger sticks when making treatment decisions although it does require 2 single point finger stick tests each day for calibration. In the United States, Canada and the countries and regions outside of the United States that recognize the CE Mark, our G6 does not require confirmatory finger sticks when making treatment decisions or finger stick tests each day for calibration, although it does require finger stick tests when symptoms do not match readings and when readings are unavailable. 11 Our Strategy Our objective is to become the leading provider of continuous glucose monitoring systems and related products to enable people with diabetes to more effectively and conveniently manage their disease. We are also developing and commercializing products that integrate our continuous glucose monitoring technologies into the insulin delivery systems or data platforms of our respective partners. In addition, we continue to pursue development partnerships with other insulin delivery companies, including automated insulin delivery systems. To achieve these objectives, we are focusing on the following business strategies Establish and maintain our technology platform as the leading approach to continuous glucose monitoring and leverage our development expertise to rapidly bring products to market, including for expanded indications. Drive the adoption of our ambulatory products through a direct sales and marketing effort, as well as key distribution arrangements. Drive additional adoption through technology integration partnerships such as our current partnerships with Eli Lilly, Insulet, Novo Nordisk, Tandem Diabetes and others. Seek broad coverage policies and reimbursement for our products from private third party payors and national health systems. Drive increased utilization and adoption of our products through a cloud based data repository platform that enables people with diabetes to aggregate and analyze data from numerous diabetes devices and share the data with their healthcare providers. Expand the use of our products to other patient care settings and patient demographics, including the hospital, people with Type 2 diabetes and people with gestational diabetes. Provide a high level of customer support, service and education. Pursue the highest safety and quality levels for our products. Our Technology Platform We believe we have a broad technology platform that will support the development of multiple products for continuous glucose monitoring. Sensor Technology The key enabling technologies for our sensors include biomaterials, membrane systems, electrochemistry and low power microelectronics. Our membrane technology consists of multiple polymer layers configured to selectively allow the appropriate mix of glucose and oxygen to travel through the membrane and react with a glucose specific enzyme to create an extremely low electrical signal, measured in pico amperes. This electrical signal is then translated into glucose values. We believe that the capability to measure very low levels of an electrical signal and to accurately translate those measurements into glucose values is also a unique and distinguishing feature of our technology. We have also developed technology to allow sensitive electronics to be packaged in a small, fully contained, lightweight sealed unit that minimizes inconvenience and discomfort for the user. Receiver and Transmitter Technology G4 PLATINUM uses proprietary radiofrequency, and G5 Mobile and G6 use Bluetooth, to wirelessly transmit information from the transmitter, which sits in a pod atop the sensor, to our receiver or to a compatible mobile device. We have developed technology for reliable transmission and reception and have consistently demonstrated a high rate of successful transmissions from transmitter to receiver or compatible mobile device in our clinical trials. Our receiver or the mobile device, via our G5 Mobile and G6 apps, then displays both real time and trended glucose values, and provides alerts and alarms. We have used our extensive database of continuous glucose data to create and refine software, algorithms and other technology for the display of data to customers. Products in Development We have gained our technology expertise by learning to design implants that can withstand the rigors of functioning within the human body for extended periods of time, as well as other issues such as device sealing, miniaturization, durability and sensor geometry. We are leveraging this technology platform to enhance the capabilities of our current products (including obtaining expanded indications of use) and to develop additional continuous glucose monitoring products. We plan to develop 12 future generations of technologies focused on improved performance and convenience and that will enable intelligent insulin administration. Over the longer term, we plan to continue to develop and improve ne2rked platforms with open architecture, connectivity and transmitters capable of communicating with other devices. We also continue to pursue and support development partnerships with insulin pump companies and companies or institutions developing insulin delivery systems, including automated insulin delivery systems. In the future, we intend to seek additional indications for our continuous glucose monitoring technology, including gestational diabetes and hospital monitoring. Eventually, we may apply our technological expertise to products beyond glucose monitoring. Disposable Sensor and Reusable Transmitter Our sensor includes a tiny wire like electrode coated with our sensing membrane system. This disposable sensor comes packaged with an integrated insertion device and is contained in a small plastic housing platform, or pod. The base of the pod has adhesive that attaches it to the skin. The sensor is intended to be easily and reliably inserted by the user by exposing the adhesive, placing the pod against the surface of the skin of the abdomen or upper buttocks for people ages 2 17, and pushing down on the insertion device. The insertion device first extends a narrow gauge needle containing the sensor into the subcutaneous tissue and then retracts the needle, leaving behind the sensor in the tissue and the pod adhered to the skin. The user then disposes of the insertion device and snaps the transmitter to the pod. After a stabilization period with the G6, the user will begin receiving CGM data on his or her mobile device or dedicated receiver through the ten day usage period. After a stabilization period with the G5 Mobile, the user is required to calibrate the sensor with 2 measurements from a single point finger stick device and the disposable sensor begins wirelessly transmitting the continuous glucose data at specific intervals to the handheld receiver or compatible mobile device. Users are prompted by the receiver or mobile app, if using the G5 Mobile, to calibrate the system twice per day with finger stick measurements throughout the use period to ensure reliable operation. Calibration may be accomplished by using any FDA cleared blood glucose meter. Currently, the G4 PLATINUM system is indicated for use as an adjunctive device to complement, not replace, information obtained from standard home blood glucose monitoring devices. Our G6 and G5 Mobile systems both have labeling from the FDA and CE Mark permitting their use as a replacement for finger sticks for making therapeutic adjustments, although the G5 Mobile still requires twice daily finger stick calibrations. The disposable sensor contained in the G6 system is intended to function for up to ten days and the G5 Mobile and G4 PLATINUM systems are intended to function for up to seven days, after which the sensor should be replaced. To replace a sensor, the user simply removes the pod and attached sensor from the skin and discards them while retaining the reusable transmitter. A new sensor and pod can then be inserted and used with the same receiver and transmitter for a subsequent use period. We are aware of reports from the field, however, that customers have been able to use the G6 and the G5 Mobile and G4 PLATINUM sensors for periods longer than ten or seven days, respectively. Handheld Receiver Our small handheld receiver is carried by the user and wirelessly receives continuous glucose values from the transmitter. Proprietary algorithms and software, developed from our extensive database of continuous glucose data from clinical trials, are programmed into the G4 PLATINUM receiver to process the glucose data from the sensor and display it on a user friendly graphical user interface. For G5 Mobile and G6, the algorithm resides on the transmitter, which then sends the processed glucose data to the receiver. With a push of a button, the user can access their current glucose value and 1 , 3 , six , twelve and twenty four hour trended data. Additionally, when glucose values are inappropriately high or low, the receiver provides an audible alert or vibrates. The receiver is a self contained, durable unit with a rechargeable battery. Compatible Mobile Devices With our G5 Mobile and G6 systems, the functionalities of our proprietary receiver can be obtained through the use of a compatible mobile device, such as an iOS or Android device, and our mobile applications, depending on the patient geographic location. A receiver may be required as the primary display device or a backup to the mobile device in some jurisdictions, including the United States. Sales and Marketing We have built a direct sales organization to call on endocrinologists, physicians and diabetes educators who can educate and influence patient adoption of continuous glucose monitoring. We believe that focusing efforts on these participants is important given the instrumental role they each play in the decision making process for diabetes therapy. 13 We believe that referrals by endocrinologists, physicians and diabetes educators, together with self referrals by customers, have driven and will continue to drive adoption of our G4 PLATINUM, G5 Mobile and G6 systems. We directly market our products in the United States, the United Kingdom, Germany, Ireland, Austria, Switzerland and Canada primarily to endocrinologists, physicians and diabetes educators. Although the number of diabetes patients is significant, the number of physicians and educators influencing these patients is relatively small. As of 2018, we estimate there were approximately 6,500 clinical endocrinologists who treat diabetes in the United States. As a result, we believe our direct, highly specialized and focused sales organization is sufficient for us to support our sales efforts for the foreseeable future. We also are increasing our direct to consumer marketing efforts to increase awareness of our CGM systems and drive new patient leads to our website. We target people with Type 1 and insulin intensive Type 2 diabetes. We advertise on television, in print, digital and video media, CRM, offer sponsorships, host or participate in diabetes related events, conduct public relations and maintain a brand ambassador program. Our campaigns target people with diabetes. We use a variety of marketing tools to drive adoption, ensure continued usage and establish brand loyalty for our continuous glucose monitoring systems by creating awareness of the benefits of continuous glucose monitoring and the advantages of our technology with endocrinologists, physicians, diabetes educators and people with diabetes; providing strong and simple educational and training programs to healthcare providers and people with diabetes to ensure easy, safe and effective use of our systems; and maintaining a readily accessible teleph1 and web based technical and customer support infrastructure, which includes clinicians, diabetes educators and reimbursement specialists, to help referring physicians, diabetes educators and people with diabetes as necessary. Our sales organization competes with the experienced and well funded marketing and sales operations of our competitors. We have relatively limited experience developing and managing a direct sales organization and we may be unsuccessful in our attempt to manage and expand the sales force. Developing a direct sales organization is a difficult, expensive and time consuming process. To be successful we must recruit and retain adequate numbers of effective sales personnel; effectively train our sales personnel in the benefits of our products; establish and maintain successful sales, marketing, training and education programs to educate endocrinologists, physicians, diabetes educators and patients about our products; manage geographically disbursed operations; and effectively train our sales personnel on the applicable fraud and abuse laws that govern interactions with healthcare practiti1rs as well as current and prospective patients and maintain active oversight and auditing measures to ensure continued compliance. Competition The market for blood glucose monitoring devices is intensely competitive, subject to rapid change and significantly affected by new product introductions and other market activities of industry participants. In selling the G4 PLATINUM, G5 Mobile and G6 systems, we compete directly with Medtronic plc Diabetes Group; Roche Diabetes Care, a division of Roche Diagnostics; privately held LifeScan, Inc.; the Diabetes Care division of Abbott Laboratories; and Ascensia Diabetes Care, each of which manufactures and markets products for the single point finger stick device market. Collectively, these companies currently account for the majority of the worldwide sales of self monitored glucose testing systems. Several companies are developing or commercializing products for continuous or periodic monitoring of glucose levels in the interstitial fluid under the skin that compete directly with our products. Medtronic plc Diabetes Group markets and sells a standal1 glucose monitoring product called Guardian Connect, which has launched both internationally and in the United States after receiving FDA approval in 2018. In 2015, Abbott Diabetes Care, Inc. launched a consumer flash glucose monitoring system, FreeStyle Libre outside the United States. Abbott first received FDA approval for a professional use version of this system in September 2016 for use in the United States, referred to as the Pro Flash, for which readings are only made available to the patient through consultation with their healthcare provider. Abbott first received FDA approval for the consumer version of this system, referred to as Flash, in September 2017 for use in the United States. Medtronic and other third parties have developed or are developing, insulin pumps integrated with continuous glucose monitoring systems that provide, among other things, the ability to suspend insulin administration while the 14 user glucose levels are low and to automate basal or bolus insulin dosing. Medtronic launched its 670G insulin delivery system in 2017. Many of our competitors are either publicly traded or are divisions of publicly traded companies, and they enjoy several competitive advantages over us. See Risk Factors, We operate in a highly competitive market and face competition from large, well established medical device manufacturers with significant resources, and, as a result, we may not be able to compete effectively. As a result, we may be unable to compete effectively against these companies or their products. We believe that the principal competitive factors in our market include safe, reliable and high quality performance of products; cost of products and eligibility for reimbursement; comfort and ease of use of products; effective sales, marketing and distribution ne2rks; brand awareness and strong acceptance by healthcare professionals and people with diabetes; customer service and support and comprehensive education for people with diabetes and diabetes care providers; speed of product innovation and time to market; regulatory expertise; and technological leadership and superiority. Manufacturing We currently manufacture our products at our headquarters in San Diego, California and at our manufacturing facility in Mesa, Arizona. As of December 31, 2018 , our headquarters facilities had approximately 31,000 square feet of laboratory space and approximately 28,000 square feet of controlled environment rooms. Our Mesa, Arizona facility has approximately 14,000 square feet of laboratory space and approximately 19,000 square feet of controlled environment rooms. There are technical challenges to increasing manufacturing capacity, including FDA qualification of new manufacturing facilities, equipment design and automation, material procurement, problems with production yields, and quality control and assurance. We have focused significant effort on continual improvement programs in our manufacturing operations intended to improve quality, yields and throughput. We have made progress in manufacturing to enable us to supply adequate amounts of product to support our commercialization efforts, however we cannot guarantee that supply will not be constrained going forward. Additionally, the production of our continuous glucose monitoring systems must occur in a highly controlled and clean environment to minimize particles and other yield and quality limiting contaminants. Developing and maintaining commercial scale manufacturing facilities has and will continue to require the investment of substantial additional funds and the hiring and retaining of additional management, quality assurance, quality control and technical personnel who have the necessary manufacturing experience. We manufacture our G4 PLATINUM, G5 Mobile and G6 systems with certain comp1nts supplied by outside vendors and other comp1nts that we manufacture internally. Key comp1nts that we manufacture internally include our wire based sensors. The remaining comp1nts and assemblies are purchased from outside vendors. We then assemble, test, package and ship the finished systems, which may include a reusable transmitter, a receiver and disposable sensors. We purchase certain comp1nts and materials used in manufacturing from single sources due to quality considerations, costs or constraints resulting from regulatory or other requirements. As of December 31, 2018 , those single sources include suppliers of application specific integrated circuits used in our transmitters, seals used for the applicator and certain polymers used to synthesize polymeric membranes for our sensors. In some cases, agreements with these and other suppliers can be terminated by either party upon short notice. We may not be able to quickly establish additional or replacement suppliers for our single source comp1nts, especially after our products are commercialized, in part because of the FDA review process and because of the custom nature of the parts we designed. Any supply interruption from our vendors or failure to obtain alternate vendors for any of the comp1nts would limit our ability to manufacture our systems, and could have a material adverse effect on our business. The advantages of the manufacturing facility in Mesa, Arizona include increasing our capacity to avoid the constraints we anticipated in our headquarters facilities commencing in 2019 2020; geographically diversify our manufacturing base to mitigate the risks of having all of our manufacturing located in earthquake and fire pr1 California; and 15 help manage certain of our operating expenses by taking advantage of Arizona lower costs and taxes relative to California. Third Party Reimbursement As a medical device company, reimbursement from Medicare, Medicaid or other governmental healthcare programs or systems, and private third party healthcare payors is an important element of our success. In January 2017, the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid, or CMS , established a classification of Therapeutic Continuous Glucose Monitors as durable medical equipment under Medicare Part B, subject to payment by Medicare under certain coverage conditions to be determined by CMS, by local Medicare Administrative Contractors or on a patient claim by claim basis. This is a decision we had pursued for many years and which was made possible by the FDA decision in December 2016 to approve a non adjunctive indication, or use, for our G5 Mobile system, as described further in the Regulatory section below. Similarly, in September 2016, Germany Federal Joint Committee agreed to provide reimbursement for continuous glucose monitoring systems under certain conditions which we believe we meet. Our G4 PLATINUM system is not classified as a Therapeutic CGM by CMS and thus remains ineligible for reimbursement within the Medicare eligible population. Reimbursement of our G4 PLATINUM system, or any future system that does not meet the requirements for Therapeutic CGMs under Medicare Part B or the requirements of another governmental healthcare system, will be limited to those customers covered by third party payors that have adopted coverage policies for continuous glucose monitoring devices that include our products. As of December 31, 2018 , the seven largest private third party payors, in terms of the number of covered lives, have issued coverage policies for the category of continuous glucose monitoring devices. In addition, we have negotiated contracted rates with all seven of those third party payors for the purchase of our G4 PLATINUM, G5 Mobile and G6 systems by their members. Many of these coverage policies reimburse for our products under durable medical equipment benefits, are restrictive in nature and require the patient to comply with extensive documentation and other requirements to demonstrate medical necessity under the policy. Customers who are insured by payors that do not offer coverage for our devices will have to bear the financial cost of the products. We currently employ in house reimbursement expertise to assist customers in obtaining reimbursement from private third party payors. We also maintain a field based reimbursement team charged with calling on third party private payors to obtain coverage decisions and contracts. We have had formal meetings and have increased our efforts to create and liberalize coverage policies with third party payors, including obtaining reimbursement for our products under pharmacy benefits and for more people with diabetes. Medicare, Medicaid, other governmental health programs, health maintenance organizations and other third party payors are increasingly attempting to contain healthcare costs by limiting both coverage and the level of reimbursement of new medical devices, and, as a result, their coverage policies may be restrictive, or they may not cover or provide adequate payment for our products. In order to obtain reimbursement arrangements, we may have to agree to a net sales price lower than the net sales price we might charge in other sales channels. Our revenue may be limited by the continuing efforts of government and third party payors to contain or reduce the costs of healthcare through various increasingly sophisticated means, such as requiring prospective reimbursement and second opinions, purchasing in a bundle, or redesigning benefits. Furthermore, we are unable to predict what effect the current or any future healthcare reform will have on our business, or the effect these matters will have on our customers. Our dependence on the commercial success of the G4 PLATINUM, G5 Mobile and G6 systems makes us particularly susceptible to any cost containment or reduction efforts. Accordingly, unless government and other third party payors provide adequate coverage and reimbursement for the G4 PLATINUM, G5 Mobile and G6 systems, people without coverage who have diabetes may not use our products. Medicare does not cover any Item or services that are not reasonable and necessary. Medicare covers the CGM system, which includes supplies necessary for the use of the device, under the Durable Medical Equipment, or DME, benefit category. In order to be covered under this benefit, 1 comp1nt of the CGM system must meet the criteria for a durable medical device. To date, the receiver satisfied this criteria. In some foreign markets, pricing and profitability of medical devices are subject to government control. In the United States, we expect that there will continue to be federal and state proposals for similar controls. Also, the trends toward managed healthcare in the United States and proposed legislation intended to reduce the cost of government insurance programs could significantly influence the purchase of healthcare services and products and may result in lower prices for our products or the exclusion of our products from reimbursement programs. 16 Intellectual Property Protection of our intellectual property is a strategic priority for our business. We rely on a combination of patents, copyrights, trademarks, tradenames, trade secrets, nondisclosure agreements and other measures to establish and protect our proprietary rights. As of December 31, 2018 , we had 449 issued U.S. patents in force, and numerous U.S. published patent applications pending. We believe it will take up to five years, and possibly longer, for our pending U.S. patent applications to result in issued patents. As of December 31, 2018 , we had 47 granted European patents, and numerous European patent applications and published international applications pending under the Patent Cooperation Treaty. Our patents began expiring in 2017. We also have 31 registered U.S. trademarks, 46 registered European Community trademarks, and a number of registered trademarks and numerous pending trademark applications in the United States and outside the United States. In addition, we have entered into exclusive and non exclusive licenses in the ordinary course of business relating to a wide array of technologies or other intellectual property rights or assets. Our Restated Collaboration Agreement with Verily provides us with an exclusive license to use intellectual property of Verily resulting from the collaboration, and certain Verily patents in the development, manufacture and commercialization of blood based or interstitial glucose monitoring products more generally (subject to certain exclusions, which are outside the CGM field as it is commonly understood). It also provides us with non exclusive license rights under Verily other intellectual property rights to develop, manufacture and commercialize those kinds of glucose monitoring products and certain CGM product companion software functionalities. Our patents and patent applications seek to protect aspects of our core membrane and sensor technologies, and our product concepts for continuous glucose monitoring. We believe that our patent position provides us with sufficient rights to protect our current and proposed commercial products. However, our patent applications may not result in issued patents, and any patents that have been issued or might be issued may not protect our intellectual property rights. Furthermore, we operate in an industry characterized by extensive patent litigation, and our patents may not be upheld if challenged. Any patents issued to us may be challenged by third parties as being invalid or unenforceable, and patent litigation may result in significant damage awards and injunctions that could prevent the manufacture and sale of affected products or result in significant royalty payments in order to continue selling the products. Third parties may also independently develop similar or competing technology that avoids our patents. The steps we have taken may not prevent the misappropriation of our intellectual property, particularly in foreign countries where the laws may not protect our proprietary rights as fully as in the United States. We also face risks associated with intellectual property infringement. See Risk Factors, We are subject to claims of infringement or misappropriation of the intellectual property rights of others, which could prohibit us from shipping affected products, require us to obtain licenses from third parties or to develop non infringing alternatives, and subject us to substantial m1tary damages and injunctive relief. We may also be subject to other claims or suits. and Our inability to adequately protect our intellectual property could allow our competitors and others to produce products based on our technology, which could substantially impair our ability to compete . We also rely on trade secrets, technical know how and continuing innovation to develop and maintain our competitive position. We seek to protect our proprietary information and other intellectual property by generally requiring our employees, consultants, contractors, outside scientific collaborators and other advisors to execute non disclosure and assignment of invention agreements on commencement of their employment or engagement. Agreements with our employees also forbid them from bringing the proprietary rights of third parties to us. We also generally require confidentiality or material transfer agreements from third parties that receive our confidential data or materials. We cannot guarantee that employees and third parties will abide by the confidentiality or assignment terms of these agreements. Despite measures taken to protect our intellectual property, unauthorized parties might copy aspects of our products or obtain and use information that we regard as proprietary. Government Regulation The medical devices that we manufacture are subject to regulation by numerous regulatory bodies, including the U.S. FDA and comparable international regulatory agencies. These agencies require manufacturers of medical devices to comply with applicable laws and regulations governing the development, testing, manufacturing, labeling, marketing and distribution of medical devices. Devices are generally subject to varying levels of regulatory control, the most comprehensive of which requires that a clinical evaluation program be conducted before a device receives approval for commercial distribution. In addition, healthcare regulatory bodies in the United States and around the world impose a range of requirements related to the payment for medical devices and the procedures in which they are used, including laws intended to prevent fraud, waste, and abuse of healthcare dollars. 17 U.S. Laws and Regulations At the U.S. federal level, our products are medical devices subject to extensive and ongoing regulation by the FDA . The U.S. Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, referred to as the FDCA, and the FDA s implementing regulations govern product design and development, pre clinical and clinical testing, pre market clearance, authorization or approval, establishment registration and product listing, product manufacturing, product labeling, product storage, advertising and promotion, product sales, distribution, recalls and field actions, servicing and post market clinical surveillance. A number of U.S. states also impose licensing and compliance regimes on companies that manufacture or distribute prescription devices in the state. In addition, the delivery of our devices in the U.S market is subject to regulation by the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services and comparable state agencies responsible for reimbursement and regulation of payment for health care Item and services. U.S. laws and regulations are imposed primarily in connection with the Medicare and Medicaid programs, as well as the government interest in regulating the quality and cost of health care. FDA Regulation Unless an exemption applies, each medical device we wish to commercially distribute in the United States will require either prior 510(k) clearance, prior de novo down classification and a related grant of marketing authorization, or prior approval from the FDA through the premarket approval, or PMA process. The FDA classifies medical devices into 1 of 3 classes. Devices requiring fewer controls because they are deemed to pose lower risk are placed in Class I or II. Class I devices are subject to general controls such as labeling, pre market notification, and adherence to the FDA s manufacturing requirements, which are contained in the Quality System Regulation, or QSR . Class II devices are subject to special controls such as performance standards, post market surveillance, FDA guidelines, or particularized labeling, as well as general controls. Some Class I and Class II devices are exempted by regulation from the pre market notification (i.e., 510(k) clearance) requirement, and or the requirement of compliance with substantially all of the QSR . As an example, the mobile applications that comprise the Share System were classified by the FDA as Class II exempt. With the mobile applications classified as Class II exempt, we must comply with certain general and special controls required by the FDA but we do not need prior FDA review to commercialize changes to the mobile applications. Some devices are placed in Class III, which requires approval of a PMA application, if they are deemed by the FDA to pose the greatest risk, such as life sustaining, life supporting or certain implantable devices, or to be not substantially equivalent either to a previously 510(k) cleared device or to a preamendment Class III device in commercial distribution before May 28, 1976 for which PMA applications have not been required. If a previously unclassified new medical device does not qualify for the 510(k) pre market notification process because no predicate device to which it is substantially equivalent can be identified, the device is automatically classified into Class III. The Food and Drug Administration Modernization Act of 1997 established a new route to market for low to moderate risk medical devices that are automatically placed into Class III due to the absence of a predicate device, called the Request for Evaluation of Automatic Class III Designation, or the de novo classification procedure. This procedure allows a manufacturer whose novel device is automatically classified into Class III to request down classification of its medical device into Class I or Class II on the basis that the device presents low or moderate risk, rather than requiring the submission and approval of a PMA. Prior to the enactment of the Food and Drug Administration Safety and Innovation Act, or FDASIA, in July 2012, a medical device could only be eligible for de novo classification if the manufacturer first submitted a 510(k) pre market notification and received a determination from the FDA that the device was not substantially equivalent. FDASIA streamlined the de novo classification pathway by permitting (under Section 513(f)(2) of the FDCA) manufacturers to request de novo classification directly without first submitting a 510(k) pre market notification to the FDA and receiving a not substantially equivalent determination. FDASIA sets a review time for FDA of 120 days following receipt of the de novo application, but FDA does not always meet this timeline and has publicly only committed to a review goal of 150 days for 50% of applications. If the manufacturer seeks reclassification into Class II, the manufacturer must include a draft proposal for special controls that are necessary to provide a reasonable assurance of the safety and effectiveness of the medical device. The FDA may reject the reclassification petition if it identifies a legally marketed predicate device that would be appropriate for a 510(k) or determines that the device is not low to moderate risk or that general controls would be inadequate to control the risks and special controls cannot be developed. If the FDA agrees with the down classification, the de novo applicant will then receive authorization to market the device, and a classification regulation will be established for the device type. The device can then be used as a predicate device for future 510(k) submissions by the manufacturer or a competitor. In December 2018, the FDA issued proposed regulations to govern the de novo classification process, which if finalized would further impact this path to market. As an alternative to the de novo process, a company could also file a reclassification petition, or the FDA could initiate such a process, seeking to change the automatic Class III designation of a novel postamendment device under Section 513(f)(3) of the FDCA. The FDA issued a final rule (to take effect March 17, 2019) to clarify the process where 18 the FDA initiates such reclassification (issuance of a proposed reclassification order; optional panel consultation; and final reclassification order published in the Federal Register). Our G4 PLATINUM and G5 Mobile systems (excluding associated Share System functionalities and mobile applications) have been classified as devices requiring PMA approval. A PMA application must be supported by valid scientific evidence, which typically requires extensive data, including technical, pre clinical, clinical, manufacturing and labeling data, to demonstrate to the FDA s satisfaction the safety and efficacy of the device. A PMA application also must include a complete description of the device and its comp1nts, a detailed description of the methods, facilities and controls used to manufacture the device, and proposed labeling. After a PMA application is submitted and found to be sufficiently complete, the FDA begins an in depth review of the submitted information. During this review period, the FDA may request additional information or clarification of information already provided. Also during the review period, an advisory panel of experts from outside the FDA may be convened to review and evaluate the application and provide recommendations to the FDA . In addition, the FDA generally will conduct a pre approval inspection of the manufacturing facility to evaluate compliance with QSR , which requires manufacturers to implement and follow design, testing, control, documentation and other quality assurance procedures. FDA review of a PMA application generally takes between 1 and 3 years, but may take significantly longer. The FDA can delay, limit or deny approval of a PMA application for many reasons, including our systems may not be safe or effective to the FDA s satisfaction; the data from our pre clinical studies and clinical trials may be insufficient to support approval; the manufacturing process or facilities we use may not meet applicable requirements; and changes in FDA approval policies or adoption of new regulations may require additional data. If an FDA evaluation of a PMA application or manufacturing facilities is favorable, the FDA will either issue an approval letter, or approvable letter, which usually contains a number of conditions which must be met in order to secure final approval of the PMA . When and if those conditions have been fulfilled to the satisfaction of the FDA , the agency will issue a PMA approval letter authorizing commercial marketing of a device, subject to the conditions of approval and the limitations established in the approval letter. If the FDA s evaluation of a PMA application or manufacturing facilities is not favorable, the FDA will deny approval of the PMA or issue a not approvable letter. The FDA may also determine that additional trials are necessary, in which case the PMA approval may be delayed for several months or years while the trials are conducted and data is submitted in an amendment to the PMA . The PMA process can be expensive, uncertain and lengthy and a number of devices for which FDA approval has been sought by other companies have never been approved by the FDA for marketing. New PMA applications or PMA supplements may be required for modifications to the manufacturing process, labeling, device specifications, materials or design of a device that is approved through the PMA process. PMA supplements often require submission of the same type of information as an initial PMA application, except that the supplement is limited to information needed to support any changes from the device covered by the approved PMA application and may or may not require as extensive clinical data or the convening of an advisory panel. Clinical trials are almost always required to support a PMA application and are sometimes required for a 510(k) clearance. These trials generally require submission of an application for an investigational device exemption, or IDE to the FDA . The IDE application must be supported by appropriate data, such as animal and laboratory testing results, showing that it is safe to test the device in humans and that the testing protocol is scientifically sound. The IDE application must be approved in advance by the FDA for a specified number of patients, unless the product is deemed a non significant risk device and eligible for abbreviated IDE requirements. Generally, clinical trials for a significant risk device may begin once the IDE application is approved by the FDA and the study protocol and informed consent are approved by appropriate institutional review boards at the clinical trial sites. The FDA s approval of an IDE allows clinical testing to go forward, but does not bind the FDA to accept the results of the trial as sufficient to prove the product safety and efficacy, even if the trial meets its intended success criteria. All clinical trials must be conducted in accordance with the FDA s IDE regulations, which govern investigational device labeling, prohibit promotion, and specify an array of Good Clinical Practice requirements, which include among other things, recordkeeping, reporting and monitoring responsibilities of study sponsors and study investigators. Clinical trials must further comply with the FDA s regulations for institutional review board approval and for informed consent and other human subject protections. Required records and reports are subject to inspection by the FDA . The results of clinical testing may be unfavorable or, even if the intended safety and efficacy success criteria are achieved, may not be considered sufficient for the FDA to grant approval or clearance of a product. The commencement or completion of any of our clinical trials may be delayed or halted, or be inadequate to support approval of a PMA application, for numerous reasons, including, but not limited to, the following 19 the FDA or other regulatory authorities do not approve a clinical trial protocol or a clinical trial, or place a clinical trial on hold; patients do not enroll in clinical trials at the rate we expect; patients do not comply with trial protocols; patient follow up is not at the rate we expect; patients experience adverse side effects; patients die during a clinical trial, even though their death may not be related to our products; institutional review boards and third party clinical investigators may delay or reject our trial protocol; third party clinical investigators decline to participate in a trial or do not perform a trial on our anticipated schedule or consistent with the clinical trial protocol, good clinical practices or other FDA requirements; DexCom or third party organizations do not perform data collection, monitoring and analysis in a timely or accurate manner or consistent with the clinical trial protocol or investigational or statistical plans; third party clinical investigators have significant financial interests related to DexCom or the study that the FDA deems to make the study results unreliable, or DexCom or investigators fail to disclose such interests; regulatory inspections of our clinical trials or manufacturing facilities, which may, among other things, require us to undertake corrective action or suspend or terminate our clinical trials; changes in governmental regulations or administrative actions applicable to our trial protocols; the interim or final results of the clinical trial are inconclusive or unfavorable as to safety or effectiveness; and the FDA concludes that the results from our trial and or trial design are inadequate to demonstrate safety and effectiveness of the product. In November 2011, we received 510(k) clearance from the FDA to market to clinics a data management service, which helps healthcare providers and patients see, understand and use blood glucose meter data to diagnose and manage diabetes. In 2014, we submitted a request to the FDA via the de novo process and the FDA agreed that our data management services with CGM data is classified as Class I. Our data transfer service allows researchers to control the transfer of data from certain diabetes devices to research tools and databases according to their own research workflows. The infrastructure of the data management service is considered medical device data systems, or MDDS, and does not require 510(k) clearance. MDDS are hardware or software products that transfer, store, convert formats, and display medical device data. An MDDS does not modify the data or modify the display of the data, and it does not by itself control the functions or parameters of any other medical device. MDDS are not intended to be used for active patient monitoring. On February 15, 2011, the FDA issued a regulation down classifying MDDS from Class III (high risk) to Class I (low risk). Since down classifying MDDS, the FDA gained additional experience with these types of technologies, and determined that these devices pose a low risk to the public. Therefore, the FDA stated in 2014 guidance that it did not intend to enforce compliance with the regulatory controls that apply to MDDS devices, including registration and listing, premarket review, postmarket reporting, and QSR for manufacturers of these types of devices. In 2016, the 21st Century Cures Act amended the Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act definition of device to exclude certain software functions, thus products meeting the definition of MDDS are no longer considered devices and thus are not subject to FDA regulatory requirements. Additional functions of, or intended uses for, our software platform may require us to obtain either 510(k) clearance or PMA approval from the FDA . To obtain 510(k) clearance, we must submit a pre market notification demonstrating that the software system is substantially equivalent to a previously cleared 510(k) device or a pre amendment device that was in commercial distribution before May 28, 1976 for which the FDA has not yet called for the submission of a PMA application. The FDA s 510(k) clearance pathway generally takes from 3 to twelve months from the date the application is completed, but can take significantly longer. After a medical device receives 510(k) clearance, any modification that could significantly affect its safety or effectiveness, or that would constitute a significant change in its intended use, requires a new 510(k) clearance. In March 2018 we obtained marketing authorization for the Dexcom G6 integrated continuous glucose monitoring (iCGM) system for determining glucose (sugar) levels in children aged 2 and older and adults with diabetes, via the de novo process. 20 After a device is authorized for marketing and placed in commercial distribution, numerous regulatory requirements apply. These include establishment registration and device listing; QSR , which requires manufacturers to follow design, testing, control, storage, supplier contractor selection, complaint handling, documentation and other quality assurance procedures; labeling regulations, which prohibit the promotion of products for unapproved or off label uses or indications and impose other restrictions on labeling, advertising and promotion; medical device reporting regulations, which require that manufacturers report to the FDA if a device may have caused or contributed to a death or serious injury or malfuncti1d in a way that would likely cause or contribute to a death or serious injury if it were to recur; voluntary and mandatory device recalls to address problems when a device is defective and or could be a risk to health; and corrections and removal reporting regulations, which require that manufacturers report to the FDA field corrections and product recalls or removals if undertaken to reduce a risk to health posed by the device or to remedy a violation of the FDCA that may present a risk to health. Also, the FDA may require us to conduct post market surveillance studies or order us to establish and maintain a system for tracking our products through the chain of distribution to the patient level. The FDA and the Food and Drug Branch of the California Department of Health Services enforce regulatory requirements by conducting periodic, unannounced inspections and market surveillance. Inspections may include the manufacturing facilities of our subcontractors. Failure to comply with applicable regulatory requirements, including those applicable to the conduct of our clinical trials, can result in enforcement action by the FDA , which may lead to any of the following sanctions warning letters or untitled letters that require corrective action; fines and civil penalties; unanticipated expenditures; delays in approving or refusal to approve our future continuous glucose monitoring systems or other products; FDA refusal to issue certificates to foreign governments needed to export our products for sale in other countries; suspension or withdrawal of FDA approval; product recall or seizure; interruption of production; operating restrictions; injunctions; and criminal prosecution. We and our contract manufacturers, specification developers, and some suppliers of comp1nts or device accessories, are also required to manufacture our products in compliance with current Good Manufacturing Practice requirements set forth in the QSR . The QSR requires a quality system for the design, manufacture, packaging, labeling, storage, installation and servicing of marketed devices, and includes extensive requirements with respect to quality management and organization, device design, buildings, equipment, purchase and handling of comp1nts or services, production and process controls, packaging and labeling controls, device evaluation, distribution, installation, complaint handling, servicing, and record keeping. The FDA evaluates compliance with the QSR through periodic unannounced inspections that may include the manufacturing facilities of our subcontractors. If the FDA believes we or any of our contract manufacturers or regulated suppliers are not in compliance with these requirements, it can shut down our manufacturing operations, require recall of our products, refuse to approve new marketing applications, institute legal proceedings to detain or seize products, enjoin future violations, or assess civil and criminal penalties against us or our officers or other employees. Any such action by the FDA would have a material adverse effect on our business. We may be unable to comply with all applicable FDA regulations. 21 U.S. Fraud and Abuse Laws and Other Compliance Requirements The healthcare industry is subject to various U.S. federal and state laws pertaining to healthcare fraud and abuse. Violations of these laws are punishable by criminal and civil sanctions, including, in some instances, exclusion from participation in U.S. federal and state healthcare programs, including Medicare and Medicaid. Anti kickback Laws. The federal Anti Kickback Statute prohibits persons from knowingly and willfully soliciting, receiving, offering or providing remuneration directly or indirectly to induce either the referral of an individual, or the furnishing, recommending, or arranging of a good or service, for which payment may be made under a federal healthcare program such as Medicare and Medicaid. The definition of remuneration has been broadly interpreted to include anything of value, including such Item as gifts, discounts, the furnishing of supplies or equipment, credit arrangements, waiver of payments, and providing anything at less than its fair market value. The Department of Health and Human Services, or HHS has issued regulations, commonly known as safe harbors, that set forth certain provisions which, if fully met, will assure healthcare providers and other parties that they will not be prosecuted under the federal Anti Kickback Statute. The failure of a transaction or arrangement to fit precisely within 1 or more safe harbors does not necessarily mean that it is illegal or that prosecution will be pursued. However, conduct and business arrangements that do not fully satisfy each applicable safe harbor may result in increased scrutiny by government enforcement authorities such as the HHS Office of Inspector General. The penalties for violating the federal Anti Kickback Statute include imprisonment for up to ten years, fines of up to $100,000 per violation and possible exclusion from federal healthcare programs such as Medicare and Medicaid. Many states have adopted prohibitions similar to the federal Anti Kickback Statute, some of which apply to the referral of patients for healthcare services reimbursed by any source, not only by the Medicare and Medicaid programs. Federal False Claims Act. The federal False Claims Act prohibits knowingly presenting, or causing to be presented a false claim or the knowing use of false statements or records to obtain payment from the federal government. When an entity is determined to have violated the False Claims Act, it must pay 3 times the actual damages sustained by the government, plus mandatory civil penalties of between $11,181 and $22,363 for each separate false claim. Suits filed under the False Claims Act, known as qui tam actions, can be brought by any individual on behalf of the government and such individuals (known as relators or, more commonly, as whistleblowers ) may share in any amounts paid by the entity to the government in fines or settlement. In addition, certain states have enacted laws modeled after the federal False Claims Act. Qui tam actions have increased significantly in recent years, causing greater numbers of healthcare companies to have to defend a false claim action, pay fines or be excluded from Medicare, Medicaid or other federal or state healthcare programs as a result of an investigation arising out of such action. Federal enforcement agencies also have showed increased interest in pharmaceutical companies product and patient assistance programs, including reimbursement and co pay support services, and a number of investigations into these programs have resulted in significant civil and criminal settlements. In addition, the Affordable Care Act amended federal law to provide that the government may assert that a claim including Item or services resulting from a violation of the federal anti kickback statute constitutes a false or fraudulent claim for purposes of the federal civil False Claims Act. Criminal prosecution is possible for knowingly making or presenting a false or fictitious or fraudulent claim to the federal government. Federal Physician Self Referral Law (Stark Law). The Stark Law prohibits a physician (or an immediate family member of a physician) who has a financial relationship with an entity from referring patients to that entity for certain designated health services ( DHS ), including durable medical equipment such as the CGM receiver and supplies, payable by Medicare, unless an exception applies. The Stark Law also prohibits such an entity from presenting or causing to be presented a claim to the Medicare program for DHS provided pursuant to a prohibited referral, and provides that certain collections related to any such claims must be refunded in a timely manner. Because we bill Medicare for DME and related supplies, the company financial relationships with referring physicians are governed by the Stark Law. Exceptions to the Stark Law include, among other things, exceptions for certain financial relationships, including both ownership and compensation arrangements. The Stark Law is a strict liability statute, therefore, to the extent that the statute is implicated and an exception does not apply, the statute is violated. In addition to the Stark Law, many states have implemented similar physician self referral prohibitions that may extend to Medicaid, third party payors, and self pay. HIPAA and Other Privacy Laws and Regulations. The Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, as amended by the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, and implementing regulations, or HIPAA, created 2 new federal crimes healthcare fraud and false statements relating to healthcare matters. The healthcare fraud statute prohibits knowingly and willfully executing a scheme to defraud any healthcare benefit program, including private payors. A violation of this statute is a felony and may result in fines, imprisonment or exclusion from government sponsored programs. The false statements statute prohibits knowingly and willfully falsifying, concealing or covering up a material fact or making any materially false, fictitious or fraudulent statement in connection with the delivery of or 22 payment for healthcare benefits, Item or services. A violation of this statute is a felony and may result in fines or imprisonment. HIPAA, as well as a number of other federal and state privacy related laws, also extensively regulate the use and disclosure of individually identifiable health information, known as protected health information, and require covered entities, including health plans and most health care providers, to implement administrative, physical and technical safeguards to protect the security of such information. Certain provisions of the security and privacy regulations apply to business associates (entities that handle protected health information on behalf of covered entities), and business associates are subject to direct liability for violation of these provisions. In addition, a covered entity may be subject to criminal and civil penalties as a result of a business associate violating HIPAA, if the business associate is found to be an agent of the covered entity. The HIPAA privacy regulations and security regulations impose and will continue to impose significant costs on us in order to comply with these standards. In addition, certain states have proposed or enacted legislation that will create new data privacy and security obligations for certain entities, such as the California Consumer Privacy Act that was recently enacted and goes into effect January 1, 2020. FCPA and Other Anti Bribery and Anti Corruption Laws. Additionally, the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, or FCPA, prohibits U.S. corporations and their representatives from offering, promising, authorizing or making payments to any foreign government official, government staff member, political party or political candidate in an attempt to obtain or retain business abroad. The scope of the FCPA would include interactions with certain healthcare professionals in many countries. Our present and future business has been and will continue to be subject to various other U.S. and foreign laws, rules and or regulations. Sunshine Act. Pursuant to the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act that was signed into law in March 2010, the federal government enacted the Physician Payment Sunshine Act. As a manufacturer of U.S. FDA regulated devices reimbursable by federal healthcare programs, we are subject to this law, which requires us to track and annually report certain payments and other transfers of value we make to U.S. licensed physicians or U.S. teaching hospitals. We are also required to report certain ownership interests held by physicians and their immediate family members. In 2018 the law was extended to require tracking and reporting of transfers of value to physician assistants, nurse practiti1rs, and other mid level practiti1rs. Reporting requirements will go into effect in 2022 for payments and transfers of value made to these additional practiti1r types in 2021 CMS has the potential to impose penalties of up to $115 million per year for violations of the Physician Payment Sunshine Act, depending on the circumstances, and payments reported also have the potential to draw scrutiny on payments to and relationships with physicians, which may have implications under the Anti Kickback Statute and other healthcare laws. International Regulation International sales of medical devices are subject to foreign government regulations, which may vary substantially from country to country. The time required to obtain approval in a foreign country may be longer or shorter than that required for FDA approval, and the requirements may differ. There is a trend towards harmonization of quality system standards among the European Union, United States, Canada and various other industrialized countries. The primary regulatory body in Europe is that of the European Union, which includes most of the major countries in Europe. Other countries, such as Switzerland, have voluntarily adopted laws and regulations that mirror those of the European Union with respect to medical devices. The European Union has adopted numerous directives and standards regulating the design, manufacture, clinical trials, labeling and adverse event reporting for medical devices. Devices that comply with the requirements of a relevant directive will be entitled to bear the CE conformity marking, indicating that the device conforms to the essential requirements of the applicable directives and, accordingly, can be commercially distributed throughout Europe. The method of assessing conformity varies depending on the class of the product, but normally involves a combination of self assessment by the manufacturer and a third party assessment by a Notified Body. This third party assessment may consist of an audit of the manufacturer quality system and specific testing of the manufacturer product. An assessment by a Notified Body of 1 country within the European Union is required in order for a manufacturer to commercially distribute the product throughout the European Union. Outside of the European Union, regulatory approval needs to be sought on a country by country basis in order for us to market our products. The European Union regulatory bodies finalized a new Medical Device Regulation (MDR) in 2017, which replaced the existing Directives and provided 3 years for transition and compliance. The MDR will change several aspects of the existing regulatory framework. Other countries have adopted medical device regulatory regimes, such as the Classification Rules for Medical Devices published by the Hong Kong Department of Health, the Health Sciences Authority of Singapore regulation of medical devices under the Health Products Act, and Health Canada risk classification system for invasive devices, among others. Each country may have its own processes and requirements for 23 medical device licensing, approval, and regulation, therefore requiring us to seek regulatory approvals on a country by country basis. Outside the United States a range of anti bribery and anti corruption laws, as well and some industry specific laws and codes of conduct, apply to the medical device industry and interactions with government officials and entities and healthcare professionals. Laws include the UK Bribery Act of 2010. Further, the EU member countries have emphasized a greater focus on healthcare fraud and abuse and have indicated greater attention to the industry by the European Anti Fraud Office. MedTech Europe, the medical device industry association, also introduced the Code of Ethical Business Practices, which came into effect on January 1, 2017. Countries in Asia have also become more active in their enforcement of anti bribery laws and with respect to procurement and supply chain fraud. In the European Union, increasingly stringent data protection and privacy rules that have and will continue to have substantial impact on the use of patient data across the healthcare industry became effective in May 2018. The EU General Data Protection Regulation, or GDPR, applies across the European Union and includes, among other things, a requirement for prompt notice of data breaches to data subjects and supervisory authorities in certain circumstances and significant fines for non compliance. The GDPR fine framework can be up to 20 million euros, or up to 4 % of the company total global turnover of the preceding fiscal year, whichever is higher. The GDPR also requires companies processing personal data of individuals residing in the European Union to comply with EU privacy and data protection rules, even if the company itself does not have a physical presence in the European Union. Noncompliance could result in the imposition of fines, penalties, or orders to stop noncompliant activities. Due to the strong consumer protection aspects of the GDPR, companies subject to its purview are allocating substantial legal costs to the development of necessary policies and procedures and overall compliance efforts. We expect continued costs associated with maintaining compliance with GDPR into the future. Environmental Regulation Our research and development and clinical processes involve the handling of potentially harmful biological materials as well as hazardous materials. We are subject to federal, state and local laws and regulations governing the use, handling, storage and disposal of hazardous and biological materials and we incur expenses relating to compliance with these laws and regulations. If violations of environmental, health and safety laws occur, we could be held liable for damages, penalties and costs of remedial actions. These expenses or this liability could have a significant negative impact on our financial condition. We may violate environmental, health and safety laws in the future as a result of human error, equipment failure or other causes. Environmental laws could become more stringent over time, imposing greater compliance costs and increasing risks and penalties associated with violations. We are subject to potentially conflicting and changing regulatory agendas of political, business and environmental groups. Changes to or restrictions on permitting requirements or processes, hazardous or biological material storage or handling might require an unplanned capital investment or relocation. Failure to comply with new or existing laws or regulations could harm our business, financial condition and results of operations. Advisory Boards and Consultants We have relied upon the advice of experts in the development and commercialization of our products. Since 2005, we have used experts in various disciplines on a consulting basis as needed to solve problems or accelerate development pathways. We may continue to engage advisors from the academic, consultancy, governmental or other areas to assist us as necessary. Employees As of December 31, 2018 , we had approximately 2,800 full time employees and approximately 1,100 contract and temporary employees globally. N1 of our employees are represented by a labor union or covered by a collective bargaining agreement. We have never experienced any employment related work stoppages and we consider our employee relations to be good. Available Information Our Internet website address is www.dexcom.com. We provide free access to various reports that we file with or furnish to the SEC through our website, as soon as reasonably practicable after they have been filed or furnished. These reports include, but are not limited to, our annual reports on Form 10 K, quarterly reports on Form 10 Q, current reports on Form 8 K, and any amendments to those reports. Our SEC reports can be accessed through the investor relations section of our website, or through www.sec.gov. Also available on our website are printable versions of our Audit Committee charter, Compensation Committee charter, Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee charter, and 24 Business Code of Conduct and Ethics. Information on our website does not constitute part of this Annual Report on Form 10 K or other report we file or furnish with the SEC. Stockholders may request copies of these documents from DexCom, Inc. 6340 Sequence Drive San Diego, CA 92121 (858) 200 0200 25 ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS Our short and long term success is subject to numerous risks and uncertainties, many of which involve factors that are difficult to predict or beyond our control. Before making a decision to invest in, hold or sell our common stock, stockholders and potential stockholders should carefully consider the risks and uncertainties described below, in addition to the other information contained in or incorporated by reference into this Annual Report on Form 10 K, as well as the other information we file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. If any of the following risks are realized, our business, financial condition, results of operations and prospects could be materially and adversely affected. In that case, the value of our common stock could decline and stockholders may lose all or part of their investment. Furthermore, additional risks and uncertainties of which we are currently unaware, or which we currently consider to be immaterial, could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition or results of operations. Refer to our disclaimer regarding forward looking statements at the beginning of our Management Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations. Risks Related to Our Business We have incurred losses since inception and anticipate that we will incur continued losses in the future. We have incurred operating losses in each year since our inception in May 1999, including an operating loss of $186.3 million for the twelve months ended December 31, 2018 . As of December 31, 2018 , we had an accumulated deficit of $798.9 million . We have financed our operations primarily through private and public offerings of equity securities and debt and the sales of our products. We have devoted substantial resources to research and development relating to our continuous glucose monitoring systems; sales and marketing and manufacturing expenses associated with the commercialization of our G4 PLATINUM, G5 Mobile and G6 systems; and expansion of our workforce. We expect our research and development expenses to increase in connection with our clinical trials and other development activities related to our products, including our next generation sensors, transmitters and sensor augmented insulin pumps, as well as other collaborations. We also expect that our general and administrative expenses will continue to increase due to the additional operational and regulatory burdens applicable to public healthcare and medical device companies. As a result, it is likely we will continue to incur operating losses in the future. These losses, among other things, have had and will continue to have an adverse effect on our stockholders equity. If, in the future, we are unable to continue the development of an adequate sales and marketing organization, or if our direct sales organization is not successful, we may have difficulty achieving market awareness and selling our products. To achieve commercial success for the G4 PLATINUM, G5 Mobile and G6 systems and any of our future products, we must either continue to develop and grow our sales and marketing organization and enter into partnerships or other arrangements to market and sell our products or collaborate with third parties to market and sell our products. Developing and managing a direct sales organization is a difficult, expensive and time consuming process. To be successful we must recruit and retain adequate numbers of effective and experienced sales personnel; effectively train our sales personnel in the benefits and risks of our products; establish and maintain successful sales, marketing, training and education programs that educate endocrinologists, physicians and diabetes educators so they can appropriately inform their patients about our products; manage geographically dispersed sales and marketing operations; and effectively train our sales personnel on the applicable fraud and abuse laws that govern interactions with healthcare practiti1rs as well as current and prospective patients and maintain active oversight and auditing measures to ensure continued compliance. We currently employ a direct sales force to sell and market our products in the United States, Canada and certain countries in Europe. Our direct sales force calls directly on healthcare providers and people with diabetes throughout the applicable country to initiate sales of our products. Our sales organization competes with the experienced, larger and well funded marketing and sales operations of our competitors. We may not be able to successfully manage our dispersed sales force or increase our product sales at acceptable rates. 26 We have also entered into distribution arrangements to leverage existing distributors already engaged in the diabetes marketplace. Our United States distribution partnerships are focused on accessing underrepresented regions and, in some instances, third party payors that contract exclusively with distributors. Our European and other international distribution partners call directly on healthcare providers and patients to market and sell our products in Australia, New Zealand, and portions of Europe, Asia, Latin America, the Middle East and Africa. Because of the competition for their services, we may be unable to partner with or retain additional qualified distributors. Further, we may not be able to enter into agreements with distributors on commercially reasonable terms, if at all. Our distributors might not have the resources to continue to support our recent rapid growth. If we are unable to establish adequate sales, marketing and distribution capabilities or enter into and maintain arrangements with third parties to sell, market and distribute our products, our business may be harmed. We have entered into distribution arrangements to leverage established distributors already engaged in the diabetes marketplace. Our distribution agreements with Byram and affiliates and Cardinal Health and affiliates (including Edgepark Medical Supplies), our 2 most significant distributors, generated approximately 12% and 15% , respectively, of our total revenue during the twelve months ended December 31, 2018 . We cannot guarantee that these relationships will continue or that we will be able to maintain this volume of sales from these relationships in the future. A substantial decrease or loss of these sales could have a material adverse effect on our operating performance. To the extent that we enter into additional arrangements with third parties to perform sales, marketing, distribution and billing services in the United States, Europe or other countries, our product margins could be lower than if we directly marketed and sold our products. To the extent that we enter into co promotion or other marketing and sales arrangements with other companies, any revenue received will depend on the skills and efforts of others, and we cannot predict whether these efforts will be successful. In addition, market acceptance of our products by physicians and people with diabetes in Europe or other countries will largely depend on our ability to demonstrate their relative safety, effectiveness, reliability, cost effectiveness and ease of use. If we are unable to do so, we may not be able to generate product revenue from our sales efforts in Europe or other countries. Finally, if we are unable to establish and maintain adequate sales, marketing and distribution capabilities, independently or with others, we may not be able to generate adequate product revenue and may not become profitable. Although many third party payors have adopted some form of coverage policy on continuous glucose monitoring devices, our products do not yet have simple broad based contractual coverage with most third party payors and we frequently experience administrative challenges in obtaining reimbursement for our customers. If we are unable to obtain adequately broad reimbursement at acceptable prices for our products or any future products from third party payors, we will be unable to generate significant revenue. As a medical device company, reimbursement from government and or commercial third party healthcare payors, including Medicare and Medicaid, is an important element of our success. In January 2017, the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services, or CMS, established a classification of Therapeutic Continuous Glucose Monitors as durable medical equipment under Medicare Part B, subject to payment by Medicare under certain coverage conditions to be determined by CMS, by local Medicare Administrative Contractors or on a patient claim by claim basis. This is a decision we had pursued for many years and which was made possible by the FDA decision in December 2016 to approve a non adjunctive indication, or use, for our G5 Mobile system. In March 2017, CMS Medicare Administrative Contractors issued interim instructions for individual claim adjudication providing instructions and billing codes for the reimbursement of individual claims for therapeutic CGM reimbursement that apply to our G6 and G5 Mobile systems, and in May 2017, CMS Medicare Administrative Contractors issued a revision to an existing joint Local Coverage Determination, or LCD, which establishes the Medicare conditions of coverage for therapeutic CGM, including G5 Mobile and G6 systems. Similarly, in September 2016, Germany Federal Joint Committee agreed to provide reimbursement for continuous glucose monitoring systems under certain conditions, which we believe are met by our G4 PLATINUM, G5 Mobile and G6 systems. A number of regulatory and commercial hurdles remain relating to wide scale sales where a government or commercial third party payors provide reimbursement, including sales to Medicare beneficiaries. If we are unable to successfully address these hurdles, reimbursement of our products may be limited to a smaller subset of people with diabetes covered by Medicare or to those people with diabetes covered by other third party payors that have adopted policies for CGM devices allowing for coverage of these devices if certain conditions are met. Adverse coverage or reimbursement decisions relating to our products by CMS, its Medicare Administrative Contractors, other state or federal payors, and or third party commercial payors could significantly reduce reimbursement, which could have an impact on the acceptance of, and demand for, our products and the prices that our customers are willing to pay for them. As of December 31, 2018 , the seven largest private third party payors, in terms of the number of covered lives, have issued coverage policies for the category of CGM devices. In addition, we have negotiated contracted rates with all seven of those third party payors for the purchase of our G4 PLATINUM, G5 Mobile and G6 systems by their members. However, 27 people with diabetes without insurance that covers our products will have to bear the financial cost of them. In the United States, people with diabetes using existing single point finger stick devices are generally reimbursed all or part of the product cost by Medicare or other third party payors. The commercial success of our products in both domestic and international markets will substantially depend on whether timely and comprehensive third party reimbursement is widely available for individuals that use them. While many third party payors have adopted some form of coverage policy on CGM devices, typically, though not exclusively, under durable medical equipment benefits, those coverage policies frequently are restrictive and require significant medical documentation and other requirements in order for policy holders to obtain reimbursement, and as a result, we have difficulty improving the efficiency of our customer service group. Moreover, it is not uncommon for governmental, including federal and or state, agencies and their contractors to conduct periodic routine billing and compliance reviews that may entail extensive documentation requests, cooperation with which may require significant time and resources. In addition, Medicare, Medicaid, other governmental health programs, health maintenance organizations and other third party payors are increasingly attempting to contain healthcare costs by limiting both coverage and the level of reimbursement of new and existing medical devices, and, as a result, they may be restrictive, or they may not cover or provide adequate payment for our products. Many of these programs impose documentation and other eligibility requirements that make it more difficult to obtain reimbursement. In order to obtain additional reimbursement arrangements, including under pharmacy benefits, we may have to agree to a net sales price lower than the net sales price we might charge in other sales channels. Our revenue may be limited by the continuing efforts of government and third party payors to contain or reduce the costs of healthcare through various increasingly sophisticated means, such as leveraging increased competition, increasing eligibility requirements such as second opinions and other documentation, purchasing in a bundle, or redesigning benefits. We are unable to predict what effect the current or any future healthcare reform will have on our business, or the effect these matters will have on our customers. Our dependence on the commercial success of the G4 PLATINUM, G5 Mobile and G6 systems makes us particularly susceptible to any cost containment or reduction efforts. Accordingly, unless government and other third party payors provide adequate coverage and reimbursement for the G4 PLATINUM, G5 Mobile and G6 systems, people without coverage who have diabetes may not use our products. Furthermore, payors are increasingly basing reimbursement rates on factors such as the effectiveness of the product, clinical outcomes associated with the product, and any factors that negatively impact the effectiveness or clinical outcomes (or cause a perception of any such negative impact), such as the results of a clinical trial, a product defect, or a product recall, which could negatively impact the reimbursement rate. Medicare does not cover any Item or services that are not reasonable and necessary. In terms of CGM, Medicare covers the CGM system, which includes supplies necessary for the use of the device, under the Durable Medical Equipment (DME) benefit category. In order to be covered under this benefit, 1 comp1nt of the CGM system must meet the criteria for a durable medical device. To date, the receiver satisfied this criteria. To the extent that a receiver is not used by a Medicare beneficiary or CMS otherwise determines that the Item and supplies ordered are not medically necessary, Medicare may not cover that CGM system or any associated supplies. In some foreign markets, pricing and profitability of medical devices are subject to government control. In the United States, we expect that there will continue to be federal and state proposals for similar controls. Also, the trends toward managed healthcare in the United States and legislative efforts intended to reduce the cost of government insurance programs could significantly influence the purchase of healthcare services and products and may result in lower prices for our products or the exclusion of our products from reimbursement programs. Uncollectible uninsured and patient due accounts could adversely affect our results of operations. The primary collection risks for our accounts receivable relate to the uninsured patient accounts and patient accounts for which the primary insurance carrier has paid the amounts covered by the applicable agreement, but patient responsibility amounts (exclusions, deductibles and copayments) remain outstanding. In the event that we are unsuccessful in collecting payments owed by patients, and or experience increases in the amount, or deterioration in the collectability, of uninsured and patient due accounts receivable, this could adversely affect our cash flows and results of operations. We may also be adversely affected by the growth in patient responsibility accounts as a result of increases in the adoption of plan structures, due to evolving health care policy and insurance landscapes that shift greater responsibility for care to individuals through greater exclusions and copayment and deductible amounts. We may never receive approval, marketing authorization or clearance from the U.S. FDA and other governmental agencies to market additional CGM systems, expanded indications for use of current and future generation CGM systems, future software platforms, or any other products under development. In March 2018, via the de novo process, the FDA classified the G6 and substantially equivalent devices of this generic type ( integrated continuous glucose monitoring systems or iCGMs ) into Class II, meaning that going forward products of this generic type may utilize the 510(k) pathway. 28 Any subsequent modification of our G6 that could significantly affect its safety or effectiveness (for example, a significant change in design or manufacture), or that would constitute a major change in its intended use, will require us to obtain a new 510(k) clearance or could require a new de novo submission or a PMA. The FDA requires each manufacturer to make this determination initially, but the FDA may review any such decision and may disagree with a manufacturer determination. If the FDA disagrees with a manufacturer determination, the FDA may require the manufacturer to cease marketing and or recall the modified device until appropriate clearance or approval is obtained. Under these circumstances, the FDA may also subject a manufacturer to significant regulatory fines or other penalties. If future product candidates are not deemed by the FDA to meet the criteria for submission under the 510(k) pathway, or for down classification under the de novo process or otherwise, we would need to pursue a PMA . The PMA process requires us to prove the safety and effectiveness of our systems to the FDA s satisfaction. This process can be expensive, prolonged and uncertain, requires detailed and comprehensive scientific and human clinical data, and may never result in the FDA granting a PMA . In March 2018, our G6 system received de novo classification from the FDA to be a Class II medical device. The de novo classification under the generic name integrated continuous glucose monitoring system, makes the G6 a predicate device for future 510(k) submissions. Complying with this classification requires ongoing compliance with the general controls required by the federal Food Drug and Cosmetic Act and the special controls specified by the FDA G6 order. Any future system or expanded indications for use of current generation systems will require approval of the applicable regulatory authorities. In addition, we intend to seek either 510(k) clearances or PMA approvals for certain changes and modifications to our existing software platform, but cannot predict when, if ever, those changes and modifications will be approved. The FDA can refuse to grant a 510(k) clearance or a de novo request for marketing authorization, or delay, limit or deny approval of a PMA application or supplement for many reasons, including the system may not be deemed by the FDA to be substantially equivalent to appropriate predicate devices under the 510(k) pathway; the system may not satisfy the FDA s safety or effectiveness requirements; the data from pre clinical studies and clinical trials may be insufficient to support approval, clearance and or marketing authorization; the manufacturing process or facilities used may not meet applicable requirements; and changes in FDA approval policies or adoption of new regulations may require additional data. Even if approved or cleared by the FDA or foreign regulatory agencies, future generations of our CGM systems, expanded indications for use of current and future generation CGM systems, our software platforms or any other continuous glucose monitoring system under development, may not be approved or cleared for the indications that are necessary or desirable for successful commercialization. We may not obtain the necessary regulatory approvals or clearances to market these continuous glucose monitoring systems in the United States or outside of the United States. Any delay in, or failure to receive or maintain, approval or clearance for our products could prevent us from generating revenue from these products or achieving profitability. The uncertain timing of regulatory approvals for future generations of our products could subject our current inventory to excess or obsolescence charges, which could have an adverse effect on our business, financial condition and operating results. If we are unable to successfully complete the pre clinical studies or clinical trials necessary to support additional PMA , de novo, or 510(k) applications or supplements, we may be unable to commercialize our continuous glucose monitoring systems under development, which could impair our business, financial condition and operating results. To support current and any future additional PMA , 510(k), de novo applications or supplements, we together with our partners, must successfully complete pre clinical studies, bench testing, and in some cases clinical trials that will demonstrate that the product is safe and effective. Product development, including pre clinical studies and clinical trials, is a long, expensive and uncertain process and is subject to delays and failure at any stage. Furthermore, the data obtained from the studies and trials may be inadequate to support approval of an application and the FDA may request additional clinical data in support of those applications, which may result in significant additional clinical expenses and may delay product approvals. While we have in the past obtained, and may in the future obtain, an investigational device exemption, or IDE, prior to commencing clinical trials for our products, FDA approval of an IDE application permitting us to conduct testing does not mean that the FDA will consider the data gathered in the trial to be sufficient to support approval of a PMA , de novo or 510(k) application or supplement, even if the trial intended safety and effectiveness endpoints are achieved. Additionally, since 2009, the FDA has significantly increased the scrutiny applied to its oversight of companies subject to its regulations, including device marketing submissions, by hiring new investigators and increasing the frequency and scope of its inspections of manufacturing facilities. The ongoing oversight by the FDA s Center for Devices and Radiological Health could complicate the product approval process for certain of our and our partners products, and we cannot predict the effect of such procedural changes and cannot ascertain if such changes will have a substantive impact on the approval of our products or our partners products. If we fail to 29 adequately respond to any changes to the 510(k) submission process and associated matters, our business may be adversely impacted. Unexpected changes to the FDA or foreign regulatory approval processes could also delay or prevent the approval of our products submitted for review. For example, as part of the 21 st Century Cures Act passed in 2016, Congress enacted several reforms that further affect medical device regulation both pre and post approval. In addition, the FDA is in the process of reviewing the 510(k) approval process and criteria and has announced initiatives to improve the current pre and post market regulatory processes and requirements associated with infusion pumps and other home use medical devices. As part of this effort, the FDA is reviewing the adverse event reporting and recall processes for insulin pumps. Any change in the laws or regulations that govern the clearance and approval processes relating to our current and future products could make it more difficult and costly to obtain clearance or approval for new products, or to produce, market and distribute existing products. The data contained in our submissions, including data drawn from our clinical trials, may not be sufficient to support approval of our products or additional or expanded indications. Medical device company stock prices have declined significantly in certain circumstances where companies have failed to meet expectations in regards to the timing of regulatory approval. If the FDA s response causes product approval delays, or is not favorable for any of our products, our stock price (and the market price of our convertible notes) could decline substantially. In November 2018, the FDA announced that it plans to make further changes aimed at modernizing the 510(k) clearance pathway, creating further uncertainty. The commencement or completion of any of our clinical trials may be delayed or halted, or be inadequate to support approval of FDA marketing applications or supplements, for numerous reasons, including, but not limited to, the following the FDA or other regulatory authorities do not approve a clinical trial protocol or a clinical trial, or place a clinical trial on hold; patients do not enroll in clinical trials at the rate we expect; patients do not comply with trial protocols; patient follow up does not occur at the rate we expect; patients experience adverse side effects; patients die during a clinical trial, even though their death may not be related to our products; institutional review boards, or IRBs, and third party clinical investigators may delay or reject our trial protocol; third party clinical investigators decline to participate in a trial or do not perform a trial on our anticipated schedule or consistent with the investigator agreements, clinical trial protocol, good clinical practices or other FDA or IRB requirements; DexCom or third party organizations do not perform data collection, monitoring and or analysis in a timely or accurate manner or consistent with the clinical trial protocol or investigational or statistical plans; third party clinical investigators have significant financial interests related to DexCom or the study that the FDA deems to make the study results unreliable, or DexCom or investigators fail to disclose such interests; regulatory inspections of our clinical trials or manufacturing facilities may, among other things, require us to undertake corrective action or suspend or terminate our clinical trials; changes in governmental regulations, policies or administrative actions applicable to our trial protocols; the interim or final results of the clinical trial are inconclusive or unfavorable as to safety or efficacy; and the FDA concludes that the results from our trial and or trial design are inadequate to demonstrate safety and effectiveness of the product. The results of pre clinical studies do not necessarily predict future clinical trial results, and prior clinical trial results might not be repeated in subsequent clinical trials. Additionally, the FDA may disagree with our interpretation of the data from our pre clinical studies and clinical trials, or may find the clinical trial design, conduct or results inadequate to prove safety or effectiveness, and may require us to pursue additional pre clinical studies or clinical trials, which could further delay the approval of our products. If we are unable to demonstrate the safety and effectiveness of our products in our clinical trials to the FDA s satisfaction, we will be unable to obtain regulatory approval to market our products in the United States. In addition, the data we collect from our current clinical trials, our pre clinical studies and other clinical trials may not be sufficient to support FDA approval, even if our endpoints are met. We may also conduct clinical studies to demonstrate the relative or comparative effectiveness of continuous glucose monitoring devices for the treatment of diabetes. These types of studies, which often require substantial investment and effort, may not show adequate, or any, clinical benefit for the use of continuous glucose monitoring devices. 30 Health care policy changes, including U.S. health care reform legislation, may have a material adverse effect on our business. In response to perceived increases in health care costs in recent years, there have been and continue to be proposals by the federal government, state governments, regulators, and third party payors to control these costs and, more generally, to reform the U.S. health care system. Certain of these proposals could limit the prices we are able to charge for our products or the amounts of reimbursement available for our products and could limit the acceptance and availability of our products. The adoption of some or all of these proposals could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Comprehensive healthcare legislation, signed into law in the United States in March 2010, titled the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, as amended by the Health Care and Education Affordability Reconciliation Act of 2010, collectively, the ACA, imposes certain stringent compliance, recordkeeping, and reporting requirements on companies in various sectors of the life sciences industry, with which we may need to comply, and enhanced penalties for non compliance with the new healthcare regulations. However, there are many programs and requirements under the ACA for which the consequences are not fully understood, and it is unclear what the full impact will ultimately be from the ACA. Costs of compliance with this legislation, or any future amendments thereto, may have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. The ACA also focuses on a number of Medicare provisions aimed at improving quality and decreasing costs. It is uncertain at this point what negative unintended consequences these provisions will have on patient access to new technologies. The Medicare provisions include value based payment programs, increased funding of comparative effectiveness research, reduced hospital payments for avoidable readmissions and hospital acquired conditions, and pilot programs to evaluate alternative payment methodologies that promote care coordination, such as bundled physician and hospital payments. Other legal, regulatory and commercial policy influences are subjecting our industry to significant changes, and we cannot predict whether new regulations or policies will emerge from U.S. federal or state governments, foreign governments, or third party payors. Government and commercial payors may, in the future, consider healthcare policies and proposals intended to curb rising healthcare costs, including those that could significantly affect reimbursement for healthcare products such as our systems. These policies have included, and may in the future include basing reimbursement policies and rates on clinical outcomes, the comparative effectiveness, and costs, of different treatment technologies and modalities; imposing price controls and taxes on medical device providers; and other measures. Future significant changes in the healthcare systems in the United States or elsewhere could also have a negative impact on the demand for our current and future products. These include changes that may reduce reimbursement rates for our products and changes that may be proposed or implemented by the current or future laws or regulations. The ACA included an excise tax on the sale of medical devices equal to 23% of the selling price of the device in the U.S. beginning in 2013 The excise tax is applicable to sales of our professional use devices. The excise tax was suspended from 2016 through 2020. As of December 31, 2018 , we believe that our current CGM products were exempt from the excise tax, except for our G4 PLATINUM system for professional use, which is subject to the excise tax. The current tax liability related to our G4 PLATINUM system for professional use is immaterial but may become material in the future. Notwithstanding our belief, if the IRS were to determine that this tax applies to any of our current or future products, our future operating results could be harmed, which in turn could cause the price of our stock to decline. In addition, because of the uncertainty surrounding these issues, the impact of this tax has not been reflected in our forward guidance. We cannot predict whether the ACA will be repealed, replaced, or modified or how such repeal, replacement or modification may be timed or structured. As a result, we cannot quantify or predict what the effect of such repeal, replacement, or modification might have on our business and results of operations. However, any changes that lower reimbursement for our products or reduce medical procedure volumes could materially and adversely affect our business, financial condition and results of operations. Consolidation in the health care industry could have an adverse effect on our revenues and results of operations. Many health care industry companies, including health care systems, distributors, manufacturers, providers, and insurers, are consolidating or have formed strategic alliances. As the health care industry consolidates, competition to provide goods and services to industry participants may become more intense. In addition, this consolidation creates larger enterprises with greater negotiating power, which they can try to use to negotiate price concessions or reductions for medical devices and comp1nts produced by us. If we are forced to reduce our prices because of industry consolidation, or if we lose customers as a result of consolidation, our revenues may decrease and our business, financial condition, results of operations and cash flows may suffer. 31 We conduct business in a heavily regulated industry and if we fail to comply with applicable laws and government regulations, we could become subject to penalties and or be required to make significant changes to our operations. The healthcare industry generally, and our business specifically, is subject to extensive foreign, federal, state and local laws and regulations, including those relating to the pricing of our products and services; the distribution of our products and services; billing for services; the obligation to report and return identified overpayments; financial relationships with physicians and other referral sources; inducements and courtesies given to physicians and other health care providers and patients; labeling products; the characteristics and quality of our products and services; confidentiality, maintenance and security issues associated with medical records and individually identifiable health and other personal information; medical device reporting; prohibitions on kickbacks, also referred to as anti kickback laws or regulations; any scheme to defraud any healthcare benefit program; physician and other healthcare professional payment disclosure requirements; personal health information; privacy; data protection; mobile communications; false claims; and professional licensure. These laws and regulations are extremely complex and, in some cases, still evolving. If our operations are found to violate any of the foreign, federal, state or local laws and regulations which govern our activities, we may be subject to litigation, government enforcement actions, and applicable penalties associated with the violation, potentially including civil and criminal penalties, damages, fines, exclusion from participation in certain payor programs or curtailment of our operations. Compliance obligations under these various laws are oftentimes detailed and 1rous, further contributing to the risk that we could be found to be out of compliance with particular requirements. The risk of being found in violation of these laws and regulations is further increased by the fact that many of them have not been fully interpreted by the regulatory authorities or the courts, and their provisions are open to a variety of interpretations. The FDA, CMS, the Office of Inspector General for the Department of Health and Human Services, Department of Justice, states attorneys general and other governmental authorities actively enforce the laws and regulations discussed above. In the United States, medical device manufacturers have been the target of numerous government prosecutions and investigations alleging violations of law, including claims asserting impermissible off label promotion of medical devices, payments intended to influence the referral of federal or state healthcare business, and submission of false claims for government reimbursement. While we make every effort to comply with applicable laws, we cannot rule out the possibility that the government or other third parties could interpret these laws differently and challenge our practices under 1 or more of these laws. This likelihood of allegations of non compliance is increased by the fact that under certain federal and state laws applicable to our business, individuals, known as relators, may bring an action alleging violations of such laws, and potentially be awarded a share of any damages or penalties ultimately awarded to the applicable government body. Under the United States Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, medical devices are classified into 1 of 3 classes Class I, Class II or Class III depending on the degree of risk associated with each medical device and the extent of control needed to ensure safety and effectiveness. Our G6 has been classified as a Class II device. Class II devices are subject to various general and special controls, including the Quality System Regulations and 510(k) pre market notification requirements. From time to time, the FDA may disagree with the classification of a new Class II medical device and require the manufacturer of that device to apply for approval as a Class III medical device. In the event that the FDA determines that our 32 Class II medical products should be classified as Class III medical devices, we could be precluded from marketing the devices for clinical use within the United States for months, years or longer, depending on the specific change in the classification. Reclassification of our Class II medical products as Class III medical devices could significantly increase our regulatory costs, including the timing and expense associated with required clinical trials and other costs. Any action against us alleging a violation of these laws or regulations, even if we successfully defend against it, could cause us to incur significant legal expenses and divert our management time and attention from the operation of our business, and have a material effect on our business. In addition, the laws and regulations impacting or affecting our business may change significantly in the future. Any new laws or regulations may adversely affect our business. A review of our business by courts or regulatory authorities may result in a determination that could adversely affect our operations. Also, the regulatory environment applicable to our business may change in a way that restricts or adversely impacts our operations. Our failure to comply with laws, regulations and contract requirements relating to reimbursement of health care goods and services may subject us to penalties and adversely impact our reputation, business, financial condition and cash flows. Our products are purchased principally by individual patients, who may be eligible for insurance coverage of their devices from various third party payors, such as governmental programs ( e.g. , Medicare, Medicaid and comparable non U.S. programs), private insurance plans, and managed care plans. The ability of our customers to obtain appropriate reimbursement for products and services from third party payors is critical because it affects which products customers purchase and the prices they are willing to pay. As a result, our products are subject to regulation regarding quality and cost by the U.S. Department for Health & Human Services, including CMS, as well as comparable state and non U.S. agencies responsible for reimbursement and regulation of health care goods and services. The principal U.S. federal laws that implicate reimbursement issues include those that prohibit (i) the filing of false or improper claims for federal payment, known as the federal civil False Claims Act, (ii) unlawful inducements for the referral of business reimbursable under federally funded health care programs, known as the federal health care program Anti Kickback Statute, and (iii) health care service providers from seeking reimbursement for providing certain services to a patient who was referred by a physician who has certain types of direct or indirect financial relationships with the service provider, known as the physician self referral law, or the Stark Law. Many states have similar laws that apply to reimbursement by state Medicaid and other government funded programs, as well as, in some cases, to all payors. In addition, the federal overpayment statute, as interpreted by CMS, requires the report and return of identified overpayments received from federal health care programs within 60 days of identification and quantification, and requires the exercise of reasonable diligence to investigate credible information regarding potential overpayments. Insurance companies can also bring a private cause of action claiming treble damages against a manufacturer for causing a false claim to be filed under the federal Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations Act, or RICO. Additionally, as a manufacturer of U.S. FDA approved devices reimbursable by federal healthcare programs, we are subject to the federal Physician Payments Sunshine Act, which requires us to annually report certain payments and other transfers of value we make to U.S. licensed physicians or U.S. teaching hospitals. On October 25, 2018, President Trump signed into law the Substance Use Disorder Prevention that Promotes Opioid Recovery and Treatment for Patients and Communities Act. This law, in part (under a provision entitled Fighting the Opioid Epidemic with Sunshine ), extends the reporting and transparency requirements for physicians in the Physician Payments Sunshine Act, to physician assistants, nurse practiti1rs, and other mid level practiti1rs. Reporting requirements will go into effect in 2022 for payments and transfers of value made to these additional practiti1r types in 2021 We may be subject to these (and other) laws regulating the provision of, and reimbursement for, health care goods and services, both in our capacity as a medical device manufacturer and or as a supplier of covered Item and services to federal health care program beneficiaries, with respect to which Item and services we submit claims for reimbursement from such programs. The laws and regulations of health care goods and services that apply to us, including those described above, are subject to evolving interpretations and enforcement discretion. As part of our compliance program, we have reviewed our sales contracts, marketing materials, and billing practices (among others) to reduce the risk of non compliance with these and other foreign, federal and state laws. If a governmental authority was to conclude that we are not in compliance with applicable laws and regulations, we and our officers, directors and employees could be subject to criminal and civil penalties, including, for example, exclusion from participation as a supplier of product to beneficiaries covered by federal healthcare programs, including but not limited to Medicare and Medicaid. Any failure to comply with laws, regulations or contractual requirements relating to reimbursement and health care goods and services could adversely affect our reputation, business, financial condition and cash flows. With respect to the federal Anti Kickback Statute, Congress and the U.S. Department of Health & Human Services Office of Inspector General, or OIG, have established a large number of statutory exceptions and regulatory safe harbors. An arrangement that fits squarely into an exception or safe harbor is immune from prosecution under the Anti Kickback Statute. 33 We train and educate employees and marketing representatives on the Anti Kickback Statute and their obligations thereunder, and we endeavor to comply with the applicable safe harbors. However, some of our arrangements, like many other common and non abusive arrangements, may implicate the Anti Kickback Statute and are not covered by a safe harbor, but nevertheless do not implicate any of the statute principal policy objectives and, as such, likely do not pose a material risk of program abuse or warrant the imposition of sanctions. However, we cannot offer assurance that arrangements that do not squarely meet an exception or safe harbor will not be found to violate the Anti Kickback Statute. Allegations of violations of the Anti Kickback Statute may be brought under the federal Civil M1tary Penalty Law, which requires a lower burden of proof than other fraud and abuse laws, including the Anti Kickback Statute. Our financial relationships with referring physicians and their immediate family members must comply with the Stark Law by meeting an applicable exception. We attempt to structure our relationships to meet an exception to the Stark Law, but the regulations implementing the exceptions are detailed and complex, and we cannot assure you that every relationship complies fully with the Stark Law. Unlike the Anti Kickback Statute, failure to meet an exception under the Stark Law results in a violation of the Stark Law, even if such violation is technical in nature. Additionally, if we violate the Anti Kickback Statute or Stark Law, or if we improperly bill for our services, or retain overpayments longer than 60 days after identification, or fail to act with reasonable diligence to investigate credible information regarding potential overpayments, we may be found to violate the federal civil False Claims Act, either under a suit brought by the government or by a private person under a qui tam relator, or whistleblower, suit. We could become the subject of governmental investigations, claims and litigation. Health care companies are subject to numerous investigations by various governmental agencies. Further, under the False Claims Act, private parties have the right to bring qui tam , or whistleblower, suits against companies that submit false claims for payments to, or improperly retain overpayments from, the government. Some states have adopted similar state whistleblower and false claims provisions. Depending upon whether the underlying conduct alleged in such inquiries or investigations could be considered systemic, the resolution could have a material, adverse effect on our financial position and results of operations. Governmental agencies and their agents, such as CMS Medicare Administrative Contractors and other CMS contractors, as well as the OIG, state Medicaid programs, and other state and federal agencies may conduct audits of our operations, relating to covered Item and services including those furnished to beneficiaries, health care providers and distributors. Commercial and government funded managed care payors may conduct similar post payment audits, and we also perform internal audits and monitoring. Depending on the nature of the conduct found in such audits and whether the underlying conduct could be considered systemic, the resolution of these audits could have a material adverse effect on our financial position and results of operations. CMS contracts with Recovery Audit Contractors, or RACs, on a contingency fee basis to conduct post payment reviews to detect and correct improper payments in the fee for service Medicare program. The ACA expanded the RAC program scope to include managed Medicare plans and Medicaid claims. RAC denials are appealable; however, there currently are significant delays in the assignment of new Medicare appeals to Administrative Law Judges, which negatively impacts our ability to appeal RAC payment denials. In addition, CMS employs various other program integrity contractors including z1 program integrity contractors, or ZPICs, Medicaid integrity contractors, or MICs, and unified program integrity contractors, or UPICs to perform post payment audits of claims and identify overpayments, and state Medicaid agencies and other contractors have increased their review activities. We are not presently aware of any governmental investigations involving our executives or us. However, any future investigations of our executives, our managers or us could result in significant liabilities or penalties to us, as well as adverse publicity. Should we be found out of compliance with any of these laws, regulations or programs, depending on the nature of the findings, our business, our financial position and our results of operations could be negatively impacted. Laws and regulations governing the export of our products could adversely impact our business. The U.S. Department of the Treasury Office of Foreign Assets Control, and the Bureau of Industry and Security at the U.S. Department of Commerce, administer certain laws and regulations that restrict U.S. persons and, in some instances, non U.S. persons, in conducting activities, and transacting business with or making investments in certain countries, governments, entities and individuals subject to U.S. economic sanctions. Due to our international operations, we are subject to such laws and regulations, which are complex, restrict our business dealings with certain countries and individuals, and are constantly changing. Further restrictions may be enacted, amended, enforced or interpreted in a manner that materially impacts our operations. Violations of these regulations are punishable by civil penalties, including fines, denial of export privileges, injunctions, asset seizures, debarment from government contracts and revocations or restrictions of licenses, as well as criminal fines and imprisonment. We have established procedures designed to assist with our compliance with such laws and regulations. 34 However, we have only limited experience dealing with these laws and regulations and we cannot guarantee that our procedures will effectively prevent us from violating these regulations in every transaction in which we may engage. Any such violation could adversely affect our reputation, business, financial condition and results of operations. If our manufacturing capabilities are insufficient to produce an adequate supply of product at appropriate quality levels, our growth could be limited and our business could be harmed. We currently have limited resources and facilities for commercially manufacturing sufficient quantities of product to meet expected demand. In the past, we have had difficulty scaling our manufacturing operations to provide a sufficient supply of product to support our commercialization efforts. From time to time, we have also experienced brief periods of backorder and, at times, have had to limit the efforts of our sales force to introduce our products to new customers. We have focused significant effort on continual improvement programs in our manufacturing operations intended to improve quality, yields and throughput. We have made progress in manufacturing to enable us to supply adequate amounts of product to support our commercialization efforts; however, we cannot guarantee that supply will not be constrained in the future. In order to produce our products in the quantities we anticipate will be necessary to meet market demand, we will need to increase our manufacturing capacity by a significant factor over the current level. In addition, we will have to modify our manufacturing design, reliability and process if and when our next generation sensor technologies are approved and commercialized. There are technical challenges to increasing manufacturing capacity, including equipment design and automation, materials procurement, manufacturing site expansion, problems with production yields and quality control and assurance. Continuing to develop commercial scale manufacturing facilities will require the investment of substantial additional funds and the hiring and retention of additional management, quality assurance, quality control and technical personnel who have the necessary manufacturing experience. The scaling of manufacturing capacity is subject to numerous risks and uncertainties, and may lead to variability in product quality or reliability, increased construction timelines, as well as resources required to design, install and maintain manufacturing equipment, among others, all of which can lead to unexpected delays in manufacturing output. In addition, any changes to our manufacturing processes may trigger the need for submissions or notifications to, and in some cases advance approval from, the FDA because of the potential impact of changes on our previously cleared or approved devices. Our facilities are subject to inspections by the FDA and corresponding state agencies on an ongoing basis, and we must comply with Good Manufacturing Practices and FDA Quality Systems Regulations. We may be unable to adequately maintain, develop and expand our manufacturing process and operations or maintain compliance with FDA and state agency requirements, and manufacturing issues could impact our cleared and approved products. If we are unable to manufacture a sufficient supply of our current products or any future products for which we may receive approval, maintain control over expenses or otherwise adapt to anticipated growth, or if we underestimate growth, we may not have the capability to satisfy market demand, contractual obligations, and our business will suffer. Additionally, the production of our products must occur in a highly controlled and clean environment to minimize particles and other yield and quality limiting contaminants. Weaknesses in process control or minute impurities in materials may cause a substantial percentage of defective products. If we are not able to maintain stringent quality controls, or if contamination problems arise, our clinical development and commercialization efforts could be delayed, which would harm our business and our results of operations. We also require the suppliers and business partners of comp1nts or services for our products to comply with law and certain of our policies regarding sourcing practices, but we do not control them or their practices. If any supplier or business partner violates laws or implements unethical practices, there could be disruptions to our supply chain, cancellation of our orders, terminations of the relationship with the partner or damage to our reputation, and the FDA or other regulators could seek to hold us responsible for such violations. In the future, if our products have material defects or errors, this could result in loss or delay of revenues, delayed market acceptance, damaged reputation, diversion of development resources, legal claims, increased insurance costs or increased service and warranty costs, any of which could harm our business. Such defects or errors could also prompt us to amend certain warning labels or narrow the scope of the use of our products, either of which could hinder our success in the market. Since the first commercial launch of our products in 2006, we have had periodic field failures related to our products, including reports of sensor errors, sensor failures, broken sensors, receiver malfunctions, audible alarms and alert failures, and transmitter failures. To comply with the FDA s medical device reporting requirements, we have filed reports of applicable product field failures. Although we believe we have taken and are taking appropriate actions aimed at reducing or eliminating field failures, we cannot guarantee that we will not have additional failures going forward. We depend upon third party suppliers, making us vulnerable to supply problems and price fluctuations, which could harm our business. We rely on single sources for certain comp1nts and materials used in manufacturing, such as for the application specific integrated circuit that is incorporated into the transmitter, seals used for the applicator and certain polymers used to 35 synthesize our polymeric biointerface membranes for our products. In some cases, our agreements with these and our other suppliers can be terminated by either party upon short notice. Our contract manufacturers also rely on single source suppliers to manufacture some of the comp1nts used in our products. Our manufacturers and suppliers may encounter problems during manufacturing for a variety of reasons, including failure to follow specific protocols and procedures, failure to comply with applicable regulations, failed FDA audit or inspection (for example, failures leading to Form 483 Observations and Warning Letters, or other enforcement actions), equipment malfunction and environmental factors, any of which could delay or impede their ability to meet our demand. If our single source suppliers shift their manufacturing and assembly sites to other locations, these new sites may require additional FDA approval and inspection. Should any such FDA approval be delayed, or such inspection require corrective action, our supply of critical comp1nts may be constrained or eliminated. Our reliance on these outside manufacturers and suppliers also subjects us to other risks that could harm our business, including we may not be able to obtain adequate supply in a timely manner or on commercially reasonable terms; our products are technologically complex and it is difficult to develop alternative supply sources; we are not a major customer of many of our suppliers, and these suppliers may therefore give other customers needs higher priority than ours; our suppliers may make errors in manufacturing comp1nts that could negatively affect the quality, effectiveness or safety of our products or cause delays in shipment of our products; we may have difficulty locating and qualifying alternative suppliers for our single source supplies; switching comp1nts may require product redesign and submission to the FDA of new applications such as a PMA or 510(k) supplement or possibly a separate PMA or 510(k), either of which could significantly delay production; our suppliers manufacture products for a range of customers, and fluctuations in demand for the products these suppliers manufacture for others may affect their ability to deliver comp1nts to us in a timely manner; our suppliers may make obsolete comp1nts that are critical to our products; and our suppliers may encounter financial hardships unrelated to our demand for comp1nts, including those related to changes in global economic conditions, which could inhibit their ability to fulfill our orders and meet our requirements. We may not be able to quickly establish additional or replacement suppliers, particularly for our single source comp1nts, in part because of the FDA inspection and approval process and because of the custom nature of various parts we design. Any interruption or delay in the supply of comp1nts or materials, or our inability to obtain comp1nts or materials from alternate sources at acceptable prices in a timely manner, could impair our ability to meet the demand of our customers and cause them to cancel orders or switch to competitive products. Potential long term complications from our current or future products or other continuous glucose monitoring systems under development may not be revealed by our clinical experience to date. Based on our experience, complications from use of our products may include sensor errors, sensor failures, broken sensors, lodged sensors or skin irritation under the adhesive dressing of the sensor. Inflammation or redness, swelling, minor infection, and minor bleeding at the sensor insertion site are also possible risks with an individual use of our products. However, if unanticipated long term side effects result from the use of our products or other glucose monitoring systems we have under development, we could be subject to liability and the adoption of our systems may become more limited. With respect to our G4 PLATINUM and G5 Mobile systems, our clinical trials have been limited to seven days of continuous use, and with respect to our G6, our clinical trials have been limited to ten days of continuous use. It is possible that the results from our clinical studies and trials may not be indicative of the clinical results obtained when we examine the patients at later dates. We cannot assure you that repeated, long term use would not result in unanticipated adverse effects, potentially even after the sensor is removed. If we or our suppliers or distributors fail to comply with ongoing regulatory requirements, or if we have unanticipated problems with our products, the products could be subject to restrictions or withdrawal from the market. Any product for which we obtain marketing approval, clearance or authorization will be subject to continual review and periodic inspections by the FDA and other regulatory bodies, which may include inspection of our manufacturing processes, post approval clinical data and promotional activities for such product. The FDA s Medical Device Reporting, or MDR , regulations require that we report to the FDA any incident in which our product may have caused or contributed to a death or serious injury, or in which our product malfuncti1d and, if the malfunction were to recur, it would likely cause or contribute to a death or serious injury. 36 If FDA determines that there is a reasonable probability that a device intended for human use would cause serious, adverse health consequences or death, the agency may issue a cease distribution and notification order and a mandatory recall order. We may also decide to recall a product voluntarily if we find a material deficiency, including unacceptable risks to health, manufacturing defects, design errors, comp1nt failures, labeling defects, or other issues. Recalls of our products could divert the attention of our management and have an adverse effect on our reputation, financial condition, and operating results. We and our suppliers are also required to comply with the FDA s Quality System Regulation, or QSR , and other regulations which cover the methods and documentation of the design, testing, production, control, selection and oversight of suppliers or contractors, quality assurance, labeling, packaging, storage, complaint handling, shipping and servicing of our products. The FDA enforces the QSR through unannounced inspections. Compliance with ongoing regulatory requirements can be complex, expensive and time consuming. Failure by us or 1 of our suppliers or distributors to comply with statutes and regulations administered by the FDA , competent authorities and other regulatory bodies, or failure to take adequate response to any observations, could result in, among other things, any of the following actions warning letters or untitled letters that require corrective action; delays in approving, or refusal to approve, our continuous glucose monitoring systems; fines and civil or criminal penalties; unanticipated expenditures; FDA refusal to issue certificates to foreign governments needed to export our products for sale in other countries; suspension or withdrawal of clearance or approval by the FDA or other regulatory bodies; product recall or seizure; administrative detention; interruption of production, partial suspension, or complete shutdown of production; interruption of the supply of comp1nts from our key comp1nt suppliers; operating restrictions; court consent decrees; FDA orders to repair, replace, or refund the cost of devices; injunctions; and criminal prosecution. The effect of these events can be difficult to quantify. If any of these actions were to occur, it would harm our reputation and cause our product sales and profitability to suffer. In addition, we believe events that could be classified as reportable events pursuant to MDR regulations are generally underreported by physicians and users, and any underlying problems could be of a larger magnitude than suggested by the number or types of MDR s filed by us. Furthermore, our key comp1nt suppliers may not currently be or may not continue to be in compliance with applicable regulatory requirements. Even if regulatory approval or clearance of a product is granted, the approval or clearance may be subject to limitations on the indicated uses for which the product may be marketed or contain requirements for costly post marketing testing or surveillance to monitor the safety or effectiveness of the product. Later discovery of previously unknown problems with our products, including software bugs, unanticipated adverse events or adverse events of unanticipated severity or frequency, manufacturing problems, or failure to comply with regulatory requirements such as the QSR , MDR reporting, or other post market requirements may result in restrictions on such products or manufacturing processes, withdrawal of the products from the market, voluntary or mandatory recalls, fines, suspension of regulatory approvals, product seizures, injunctions, the imposition of civil or criminal penalties, or criminal prosecution. In addition, our distributors have rights to create marketing materials for their sales of our products, and may not adhere to contractual, legal or regulatory limitations that are imposed on their marketing efforts. We are subject to claims of infringement or misappropriation of the intellectual property rights of others, which could prohibit us from shipping affected products, require us to obtain licenses from third parties or to develop non infringing alternatives, and subject us to substantial m1tary damages and injunctive relief. We may also be subject to other claims or suits. Third parties have asserted, and may assert, infringement or misappropriation claims against us with respect to our current or future products. We are aware of numerous patents issued to third parties that may relate to aspects of our business, including the design and manufacture of continuous glucose monitoring sensors and membranes, as well as methods for 37 continuous glucose monitoring. Whether a product infringes a patent involves complex legal and factual issues, the determination of which is often uncertain. Therefore, we cannot be certain that we have not infringed the intellectual property rights of such third parties or others. Our competitors may assert that our continuous glucose monitoring systems or the methods we employ in the use of our systems are covered by U.S. or foreign patents held by them. This risk is exacerbated by the fact that there are numerous issued patents and pending patent applications relating to self monitored glucose testing systems in the medical technology field. Because patent applications may take years to issue, there may be applications now pending of which we are unaware that may later result in issued patents that our products infringe. There could also be existing patents of which we are unaware that 1 or more comp1nts of our system may inadvertently infringe. As the number of competitors in the market for continuous glucose monitoring systems grows, the possibility of inadvertent patent infringement by us or a patent infringement claim against us increases. We have been and continue to be involved in various patent infringement actions, including On March 28, 2016, AgaMatrix, Inc., or AgaMatrix, filed a patent infringement lawsuit against us in the United States District Court for the District of Oregon, asserting that certain of our products infringe certain patents held by AgaMatrix. On June 6, 2016, AgaMatrix filed a First Amended Complaint asserting the same 3 patents. On February 24, 2017, the Court granted AgaMatrix motion to substitute WaveForm Technologies, Inc., or WaveForm, as the new plaintiff following AgaMatrix transfer of the 3 patents to its newly formed entity. On August 25, 2016, we filed petitions for inter partes review with the Patent Trial and Appeal Board, or PTAB, of the U.S. Patent and Trademark Office seeking a determination that 2 of the 3 asserted patents are invalid under U.S. patent law and those petitions were granted on March 6, 2017. On March 8, 2017, we filed a petition for inter partes review with the PTAB seeking a determination that the third of the 3 asserted patents is invalid under U.S. patent law. This petition was granted on September 15, 2017. The PTAB issued a Final Written Decision for each of the first 2 patents on February 28, 2018, where the PTAB found the majority of asserted claims from the first patent unpatentable and the remaining claims under review not unpatentable. The PTAB found all claims under review from the second patent not unpatentable. We believe the PTAB erred in finding any claims of the first 2 patents not unpatentable, and appealed the PTAB decision to the United States Court of Appeals for the Federal Circuit, or Federal Circuit, on March 30, 2018. Briefing of the appeal is complete and we are currently awaiting the dates for oral argument from the Court of Appeals. The PTAB issued a Final Written Decision for the third patent on September 12, 2018, where the PTAB found all claims of the third patent asserted against us in the District of Oregon litigation unpatentable. WaveForm did not appeal this decision. On January 4, 2019, the parties stipulated to the dismissal of all claims and counterclaims regarding the third asserted patent. Most activity in the patent infringement lawsuit against us in the District of Oregon was stayed until the PTAB completed the inter partes review proceedings. That stay was lifted on October 10, 2018. The remaining claims and counterclaims will continue with an estimated date of trial in February 2020. It is our position that Waveform assertions of infringement have no merit. We have also filed several lawsuits against AgaMatrix. We filed a patent infringement lawsuit against AgaMatrix in the United States District Court for the Central District of California, or C.D. Cal., which is currently on appeal to the Federal Circuit based on a Final Judgment of non infringement entered by the C.D. Cal. judge on February 23, 2018. AgaMatrix sought attorneys fees for this lawsuit and as of December 31, 2018 we have accrued an immaterial amount for those fees. On September 15, 2017, we filed a patent infringement lawsuit against AgaMatrix in the United States District Court for the District of Delaware, asserting certain single point blood glucose monitoring products of AgaMatrix infringe 2 patents held by us. In addition, on September 18, 2017, we filed a Complaint against AgaMatrix in the International Trade Commission, referred to as the ITC, requesting that the ITC institute an investigation and issue an order excluding certain products of AgaMatrix from importation into or sale in the United States based on AgaMatrix infringement of the same 2 patents asserted in the Delaware litigation. On September 14, 2018, AgaMatrix filed 2 petitions for inter partes review for each of the same 2 patents we asserted in the District of Delaware and the ITC. We filed a response to all four petitions on December 17, 2018. AgaMatrix had requested additional briefing on the matter and the PTAB has authorized both sides to do so. Briefing was completed in January 2019. Neither the outcome of these lawsuits nor the amount and range of potential loss associated with the lawsuits can be assessed at this time. Other than the attorneys fees described above, as of December 31, 2018 we have accrued no amounts for contingent losses associated with these suits. Any infringement or misappropriation claim could cause us to incur significant costs, place significant strain on our financial resources, divert management attention from our business and harm our reputation. If the relevant patents are upheld as valid and enforceable and we are found to infringe such patents, we could be prohibited from selling any of our products that is found to infringe unless we could obtain licenses to use the technology covered by the patent or are able to design around the patent. We may be unable to obtain a license on terms acceptable to us, if at all, and we may not be able to redesign our products to avoid infringement. Even if we are able to redesign our products to avoid an infringement claim, we may not receive FDA approval for such changes in a timely manner or at all. A court could also order us to pay compensatory damages for such infringement, plus prejudgment interest and could, in addition, treble the compensatory damages and award attorney fees. These damages could be substantial and could harm our reputation, business, financial condition and operating results. A 38 court also could enter orders that temporarily, preliminarily or permanently enjoin us and our customers from making, using, selling or offering to sell 1 or more of our products, or could enter an order mandating that we undertake certain remedial activities. Depending on the nature of the relief ordered by the court, we could become liable for additional damages to third parties. Any adverse determination in litigation or interference proceedings to which we are or may become a party relating to patents or other intellectual property rights could subject us to significant liabilities to third parties or require us to seek licenses from other third parties. Furthermore, if we are found to willfully infringe third party patents, we could, in addition to other penalties, be required to pay treble damages and or attorneys fees for the prevailing party. Although patent and intellectual property disputes in the medical device area have often been settled through licensing or similar arrangements, costs associated with such arrangements may be substantial and would likely include ongoing royalties. We may be unable to obtain necessary intellectual property licenses on satisfactory terms. If we do not obtain any such necessary licenses, we may not be able to redesign our products to avoid infringement and any redesign may not receive FDA approval in a timely manner or at all. Adverse determinations in a judicial or administrative proceeding or failure to obtain necessary intellectual property licenses could prevent us from manufacturing and selling our products, which would have a significant adverse impact on our business. In addition, from time to time, we are subject to various claims and suits arising out of the ordinary course of business, including commercial or employment related matters. Although individually we do not expect these claims or suits to have a material adverse effect on DexCom, in the aggregate they may divert significant time and resources from our staff. Our inability to adequately protect our intellectual property could allow our competitors and others to produce products based on our technology, which could substantially impair our ability to compete. Our success and our ability to compete depend, in part, upon our ability to maintain the proprietary nature of our technologies. We rely on a combination of patent, copyright and trademark law, and trade secrets and nondisclosure agreements to protect our intellectual property. However, such methods may not be adequate to protect us or permit us to gain or maintain a competitive advantage. Our patent applications may not issue as patents in a form that will be advantageous to us, or at all. Our issued patents, and those that may issue in the future, may be challenged, invalidated or circumvented, which could limit our ability to stop competitors from marketing related products. In addition, there are numerous recent changes to the patent laws and proposed changes to the rules of the U.S. Patent and Trademark Office, which may have a significant impact on our ability to protect our technology and enforce our intellectual property rights. For example, in September 2011, the United States enacted sweeping changes to its patent system under the Leahy Smith America Invents Act, including changes that would transition the United States from a first to invent system to a first to file system and alter the processes for challenging issued patents. These changes could increase the uncertainties and costs surrounding the prosecution of our patent applications and the enforcement or defense of our issued patents. To protect our proprietary rights, we may in the future need to assert claims of infringement against third parties. The outcome of litigation to enforce our intellectual property rights in patents, copyrights, trade secrets or trademarks is highly unpredictable, could result in substantial costs and diversion of resources, and could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations regardless of the final outcome of such litigation. In the event of an adverse judgment, a court could hold that some or all of our asserted intellectual property rights are not infringed, or are invalid or unenforceable, and could award attorney fees. Despite our efforts to safeguard our unpatented and unregistered intellectual property rights, we may not succeed in doing so or the steps taken by us in this regard may not be adequate to detect or deter misappropriation of our technology or to prevent an unauthorized third party from copying or otherwise obtaining and using our products, technology or other information that we regard as proprietary. In addition, third parties may be able to design around our patents. Furthermore, the laws of foreign countries may not protect our proprietary rights to the same extent as the laws of the United States. We operate in a highly competitive market and face competition from large, well established medical device manufacturers with significant resources, and, as a result, we may not be able to compete effectively. The market for glucose monitoring devices is intensely competitive, subject to rapid change and significantly affected by new product introductions and other market activities of industry participants. In selling the G4 PLATINUM, G5 Mobile and G6 systems, we compete directly with Medtronic plc Diabetes Group; Roche Diabetes Care, a division of Roche Diagnostics; privately held LifeScan, Inc.; the Diabetes Care division of Abbott Laboratories; and Ascensia Diabetes Care, each of which manufactures and markets products for the single point finger stick device market. Collectively, these companies currently account for the majority of the worldwide sales of self monitored glucose testing systems. Several companies are developing or commercializing products for continuous or periodic monitoring of glucose levels in the interstitial fluid under the skin that compete directly with our products. Medtronic plc Diabetes Group markets and sells a standal1 glucose monitoring product called Guardian Connect, which has launched both internationally and in the United States after receiving FDA approval in 2018. In 2015, Abbott Diabetes Care, Inc. launched a consumer flash glucose 39 monitoring system, FreeStyle Libre outside the United States. Abbott first received FDA approval for a professional use version of this system in September 2016 for use in the United States, referred to as the Pro Flash, for which readings are only made available to the patient through consultation with their healthcare provider. Abbott first received FDA approval for the consumer version of this system, referred to a Flash, in September 2017 for use in the United States. Medtronic and other third parties have developed or are developing insulin pumps integrated with continuous glucose monitoring systems that provide, among other things, the ability to suspend insulin administration while the user glucose levels are low and to automate basal and bolus insulin dosing. Medtronic launched its 670G insulin delivery system in 2017. Some of the companies developing or marketing competing devices are publicly traded or divisions of publicly traded companies, and these companies possess several competitive advantages over us, including significantly greater name recognition; established relations with healthcare professionals, customers and third party payors; established distribution ne2rks; additional lines of products, and the ability to bundle products to offer higher discounts or incentives to gain a competitive advantage; greater experience in conducting research and development, manufacturing, clinical trials, obtaining regulatory approval for products and marketing approved products; the ability to integrate multiple products to provide additional features beyond continuous glucose monitoring; and greater financial and human resources for product development, manufacturing, sales and marketing, and patent litigation. As a result, we may not be able to compete effectively against these companies or their products, which may adversely impact our business. We enter into collaborations with third parties that may not result in the development of commercially viable products or the generation of significant future revenues. In the ordinary course of our business, we enter into collaborative arrangements to develop new products and to pursue new markets, such as our agreements with Eli Lilly, Insulet, Novo Nordisk and Tandem Diabetes, to integrate our continuous glucose monitoring technology into their insulin delivery systems, and our recently amended agreement with Verily to develop 1 or more next generation CGM products. Our Eli Lilly, Insulet, Novo Nordisk and Verily collaborations have not yet resulted in a commercial product. In June 2018, Tandem received FDA approval for its latest sensor augmented insulin delivery system, the tslim X2 Insulin Pump Basal IQ TM technology, which integrates with our G6 system. As a result of these development relationships, our operating results depend, to some extent, on the ability of our development partners to successfully commercialize their insulin delivery systems or monitoring products. Any factors that may limit our partners ability to achieve widespread adoption of their systems, including competitive pressures, technological breakthroughs for the treatment or prevention of diabetes, adverse regulatory or legal actions relating to insulin pump products, or changes in reimbursement rates or policies of third party payors relating to insulin pumps or similar products, could have an adverse impact on our operating results. For example, Animas announced in September 2017 that it has discontinued the manufacturing and sale of Animas Vibe and 1Touch Ping insulin pumps, then exited the insulin pump business. Animas selected Medtronic as its partner to facilitate a seamless transition for patients, caregivers and healthcare providers. Patients using an Animas insulin pump are offered the option to transfer to a Medtronic pump. As Animas Vibe is compatible with DexCom products, and Animas has served as a distributor for our products in certain geographies, the transition of Animas customers to Medtronic pumps, which are not integrated with our sensors, may adversely impact our revenues. As another example, UnitedHealthcare announced, effective July 1, 2016, that UnitedHealthcare Community Plan and Commercial members will no longer have an in ne2rk choice among providers of insulin pumps, and designated Medtronic as its preferred, in ne2rk provider. We do not have a relationship to integrate our CGM technology with Medtronic, which has developed an insulin pump augmented with its proprietary continuous glucose monitoring system. The decision by UnitedHealthcare to establish Medtronic as its preferred provider of insulin pumps could result in a material reduction in the number of insulin pumps sold by other insulin pump manufacturers, including Tandem and Insulet. In addition, it is possible that other large third party payors will establish preferred providers of insulin pumps, which may or may not include the pumps produced by our development partners. Many of the companies that we collaborate with are also competitors or potential competitors who may decide to terminate our collaborative arrangement. In the event of such a termination, we may be required to devote additional resources to product development and commercialization, we may need to cancel some development programs and we may face increased competition. Additionally, collaborations may not result in the development of products that achieve commercial success and could be terminated prior to developing any products. Former collaborators may use the experience and insights 40 they develop in the course of their collaborations with us to initiate or accelerate their development of products that compete with our products, which may create competitive disadvantages for us. Accordingly, we cannot provide assurance that any of our collaborations will result in the successful development of a commercially viable product or result in significant additional future revenues. In addition, our development timelines are highly dependent on our ability to achieve clinical endpoints and regulatory requirements and to overcome technology challenges, and may be delayed due to scheduling issues with patients and investigators, requests from institutional review boards, product performance and manufacturing supply constraints, among other factors. In addition, support of these clinical trials requires significant resources from employees involved in the production of our products, including research and development, manufacturing, quality assurance, and clinical and regulatory personnel. Even if our development and clinical trial efforts succeed, the FDA may not approve the combined products or may require additional product testing and clinical trials before approving the combined products, which would result in product launch delays and additional expense. If approved by the FDA , the combined products may not be accepted in the marketplace by physicians and people with diabetes. Technological breakthroughs by us or our competitors could materially impact sales of current or future generations of our products. The glucose monitoring market is subject to rapid technological change and product innovation. Our products are based on our proprietary technology, but a number of companies and medical researchers are pursuing new technologies for the monitoring of glucose levels. FDA or other regulatory approval of a commercially viable continuous glucose monitor or sensor produced by 1 of our competitors could significantly reduce market acceptance of our systems. As discussed above in the risk factor entitled We operate in a highly competitive market and face competition from large, well established medical device manufacturers with significant resources, and, as a result, we may not be able to compete effectively , several of our competitors are in various stages of developing continuous or intermittent glucose monitors or sensors, including non invasive and invasive devices, and the FDA has approved a number of these competing products. In addition, certain development efforts throughout the diabetes industry, including that of the National Institutes of Health and other supporters of diabetes research are continually seeking ways to prevent, cure or improve treatment of diabetes. Therefore, our products may be rendered obsolete by technological breakthroughs in diabetes monitoring, treatment, prevention or cure. In addition, in the periods leading up to the launch of new or upgraded versions of our continuous glucose monitoring products, our customers anticipation of the release of those products may cause them to cancel, change or delay current period purchases of our current products, which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. We face the risk of product liability claims and may not be able to maintain or obtain insurance. Our business exposes us to the risk of product liability claims that is inherent in the testing, manufacturing and marketing of medical devices, including those which may arise from the misuse (including system hacking or other unauthorized access by third parties to our systems) or malfunction of, or design flaws in, our products. This liability may vary based on the FDA classification associated with our devices. Notably, the classification of our G6 system as a Class II medical device is likely to weaken our ability to rely on federal preemption of state law claims that assert liability against us for harms arising from use of the G6. We may be subject to product liability claims if our products cause, or merely appear to have caused, an injury. Claims may be made by customers, healthcare providers or others selling our products. The risk of product liability claims may increase now that our G5 Mobile system has obtained indications and approved labeling in the United States, in Canada, and in the countries utilizing the CE Mark that allow for our patients to make diabetes treatment decisions with our CGM technology in conjunction with only 2 finger sticks required for calibration of the system and our G6 does not require confirmatory finger sticks when making treatment decisions or finger stick tests each day for calibration, although it does require finger stick tests when symptoms do not match readings and when readings are unavailable. The risk of claims may also increase if our products are subject to a product recall or seizure. An example of the difficulty of complying with the regulatory requirements associated with the manufacture of our products, we issued notifications to our customers regarding the audible alarms and alerts associated with our receivers, as discussed earlier in the risk factor entitled If we or our suppliers or distributors fail to comply with ongoing regulatory requirements, or if we experience unanticipated problems with our products, the products could be subject to restrictions or withdrawal from the market. Although we have product liability and clinical trial liability insurance that we believe is appropriate, this insurance is subject to deductibles and coverage limitations. Our current product liability insurance may not continue to be available to us on acceptable terms, if at all, and, if available, the coverage may not be adequate to protect us against any future product liability claims. Further, if additional products are approved for marketing, we may seek additional insurance coverage. If we are unable to obtain insurance at an acceptable cost or on acceptable terms with adequate coverage or otherwise protect against potential product liability claims, we will be exposed to significant liabilities, which may harm our business. A product liability 41 claim, recall or other claim with respect to uninsured liabilities or for amounts in excess of insured liabilities could result in significant costs and significant harm to our business. We may be subject to claims against us even if the apparent injury is due to the actions of others or misuse of the device. Our customers, either on their own or following the advice of their physicians, may use our products in a manner not described in the products labeling and that differs from the manner in which it was used in clinical studies and approved by the FDA . For example, our current systems are designed to be used by an individual continuously for up to seven days for our G4 PLATINUM and G5 Mobile system and up to 10 days for our G6 system, but the individual might be able to circumvent the safeguards designed into the systems and use the products for longer than seven or 10 days. Off label use of products by customers is common, and any such off label use of our products could subject us to additional liability, or require design changes to limit this potential off label use once discovered. The CE Mark and the recent HealthCanada and FDA approvals for our G5 Mobile system include indications that allow patients to make diabetes treatment decisions based on the information generated by such system, although both regulators still require finger stick calibrations twice per day. In addition, other regulatory agencies may in the future approve similar diabetes treatment indications. We expect that such diabetes treatment indications could expose us to additional liability. These liabilities could prevent or interfere with our product commercialization efforts. Defending a suit, regardless of merit, could be costly, could divert management attention and might result in adverse publicity, which could result in the withdrawal of, or inability to recruit, clinical trial volunteers or result in reduced acceptance of our products in the market. We may be subject to fines, penalties and injunctions if we are determined to be promoting the use of our products for unapproved or improper off label uses. Although we believe our promotional materials and practices comply with FDCA and other applicable laws and regulations, as may be amended from time to time, if the FDA or other regulatory body with competent jurisdiction over us, our activities or products takes the position that our marketing, promotional or other materials or activities constitute improper promotion or marketing of an unapproved or improper use, the FDA or other regulatory body could request that we modify our materials or practices, or subject us to regulatory enforcement actions, including the issuance of a warning letter, injunction, seizure, civil fine and criminal penalties. It is also possible that other federal, state or foreign enforcement authorities might take action if they consider promotional, marketing or other materials or activities to constitute improper promotion of an unapproved use, which could result in significant fines or penalties under other statutory authorities, such as laws prohibiting false claims for reimbursement. Recent court decisions have impacted the FDA enforcement activity regarding off label promotion in light of First Amendment considerations; however, there are still significant risks in this area in part due to the potential False Claims Act exposure. We are subject to complex and evolving U.S. and foreign laws and regulations regarding privacy, data protection, and other matters. Many of these laws and regulations are subject to change and uncertain interpretation, and could result in claims, changes to our business practices, m1tary penalties, increased cost of operations, or declines in user growth or engagement, or otherwise harm our business. We are subject to a number of foreign, federal and state laws and regulations protecting the use and confidentiality of certain patient health and personal information, including patient records, and restricting the use and disclosure of that protected information. These laws include foreign, federal and state medical privacy laws, breach notification laws and foreign, federal and state consumer protection laws. In addition, foreign data protection, privacy, and other laws and regulations can be more restrictive than those in the United States. For example, data localization laws in some countries generally mandate that certain types of data collected in a particular country be stored and or processed within that country. We could be subject to audits in Europe and around the world, particularly in the areas of consumer and data protection, as we continue to grow and expand our operations. Legislators and regulators may make legal and regulatory changes, or interpret and apply existing laws, in ways that make our products less useful to our customers, require us to incur substantial costs, expose us to unanticipated civil or criminal liability, or cause us to change our business practices. These changes or increased costs could negatively impact our business and results of operations in material ways. In the ordinary course of our business, we collect and store sensitive data, such as our proprietary business information and that of our clients as well as personally identifiable information of our customers, including full names, social security numbers, addresses, and birth dates, in our data centers and on our ne2rks. Our employees may also have access to and may use personal health information in the ordinary course of our business. The secure processing, maintenance and transmission of this information is critical to our operations. Despite our security measures and business controls, our information technology and infrastructure may be vulnerable to attacks by hackers, breaches due to employee, contractor or vendor error, or malfeasance or other disruptions or subject to the inadvertent or intentional unauthorized release of information. Any such occurrence could compromise our ne2rks and the information stored thereon could be accessed, publicly disclosed, lost or stolen. Any such access, disclosure or other loss of information could (i) result in legal claims or proceedings, and liability 42 under laws that protect the privacy of personal information and regulatory penalties, (ii) disrupt our operations and the services we provide to our clients and (iii) damage our reputation, any of which could adversely affect our profitability, revenue and competitive position. As we grow and expand our administrative, customer support or IT support services, we may also utilize the services of personnel and contractors located outside of the United States to perform certain functions. While we make every effort to review our applicable contracts and other payor requirements, a local, state, or federal government agency or 1 of our customers may find the use of offshore resources to be a violation of a legal or contractual requirement, which could result in termination of the contractual relationship, penalties, or changes in our business operations that could adversely affect our business, financial condition, and results of operations. Additionally, while we have implemented industry standard security measures for offshore access to protected health information and other personal information, unauthorized access or disclosure of such information by offshore personnel may result in (i) legal claims or proceedings, and liability under laws that protect the privacy of personal information and regulatory penalties, (ii) a disruption of our operations and the services we provide to our clients or (iii) damage to our reputation, any of which could adversely affect our profitability, revenue and competitive position. Security breaches and other disruptions could compromise our information and expose us to liability, which would cause our business and reputation to suffer and could subject us to substantial liabilities. The Administrative Simplification Provisions of the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act, or HIPAA, as amended, and implementing regulations, extensively regulate the use and disclosure of individually identifiable health information, known as protected health information, and require covered entities, including health plans and most health care providers, to implement administrative, physical and technical safeguards to protect the security of such information. Certain provisions of the security and privacy regulations apply to business associates (entities that handle protected health information on behalf of covered entities), and business associates are subject to direct liability for violation of these provisions. In addition, a covered entity may be subject to penalties as a result of a business associate violating HIPAA, if the business associate is found to be an agent of the covered entity. Covered entities must report breaches of unsecured protected health information to affected individuals without unreasonable delay and notification must also be made to the U.S. Department of Health & Human Services, Office for Civil Rights, or OCR and, in certain situations involving large breaches, to the media. Various U.S. state laws and regulations may also require us to notify affected individuals and state agencies in the event of a data breach involving individually identifiable information. Violations of the HIPAA privacy and security regulations may result in criminal and civil penalties. The OCR enforces the regulations and performs compliance audits. In addition to enforcement by OCR, state attorneys general are authorized to bring civil actions seeking either injunction or damages in response to violations that threaten the privacy of state residents. OCR may resolve HIPAA violations through informal means, such as allowing a covered entity to implement a corrective action plan, but OCR has the discretion to move directly to impose m1tary penalties and is required to impose penalties for violations resulting from willful neglect. We follow and maintain a HIPAA compliance plan, which we believe complies with the HIPAA privacy and security regulations, but there can be no assurance that OCR or other regulators will agree. The HIPAA privacy regulations and security regulations have and will continue to impose significant costs on us in order to comply with these standards. There are numerous other laws and legislative and regulatory initiatives at the federal and state levels addressing privacy and security concerns. We also remain subject to federal or state privacy related laws that are more restrictive than the privacy regulations issued under HIPAA. These laws vary and could impose additional penalties. For example, the Federal Trade Commission uses its consumer protection authority to initiate enforcement actions in response to alleged privacy violations and data breaches. California recently enacted the California Consumer Privacy Act, or CCPA, which goes into effect January 1, 2020. The CCPA, among other things, creates new data privacy obligations for covered companies and provides new privacy rights to California residents, including the right to opt out of certain disclosures of their information. The CCPA also creates a private right of action with statutory damages for certain data breaches, thereby potentially increasing risks associated with a data breach. Legislators have stated that they intend to propose amendments to the CCPA before it goes into effect, and the California Attorney General will issue clarifying regulations. It remains unclear what, if any, modifications will be made to this legislation or how it will be interpreted. The effects of the CCPA potentially are significant, however, and may require us to modify our data processing practices, and may cause us to incur substantial costs and expenses to comply. We are also subject to laws and regulations in foreign countries covering data privacy and other protection of health and employee information that may be more 1rous than corresponding U.S. laws, including in particular the laws of Europe. For instance, in the European Union, increasingly stringent data protection and privacy rules that have and will continue to have substantial impact on the use of patient data across the healthcare industry became effective in May 2018. The EU General Data Protection Regulation, or GDPR, applies across the European Union and includes, among other things, a requirement for prompt notice of data breaches to data subjects and supervisory authorities in certain circumstances and 43 significant fines for non compliance. The GDPR fine framework can be up to 20 million euros, or up to 4 % of the company total global turnover of the preceding fiscal year, whichever is higher. The GDPR also requires companies processing personal data of individuals residing in the European Union to comply with EU privacy and data protection rules, even if the company itself does not have a physical presence in the European Union. Noncompliance could result in the imposition of fines, penalties, or orders to stop noncompliant activities. Due to the strong consumer protection aspects of the GDPR, companies subject to its purview are allocating substantial legal costs to the development of necessary policies and procedures and overall compliance efforts. We expect continued costs associated with maintaining compliance with GDPR into the future, and these provisions as interpreted by EU agencies, could negatively impact our business, financial condition and results of operations. Cybersecurity risks and cyber incidents could result in the compromise of confidential data or critical data systems and give rise to potential harm to customers, remediation and other expenses, expose us to liability under HIPAA, consumer protection laws, or other common law theories, subject us to litigation and federal and state governmental inquiries, damage our reputation, and otherwise be disruptive to our business and operations. Cyber incidents can result from deliberate attacks or unintentional events. We collect and store on our ne2rks sensitive information, including intellectual property, proprietary business information and personally identifiable information of our customers. The secure maintenance of this information and technology is critical to our business operations. We have implemented multiple layers of security measures to protect the confidentiality, integrity and availability of this data and the systems and devices that store and transmit such data. We utilize current security technologies, and our defenses are monitored and routinely tested internally and by external parties. Despite these efforts, threats from malicious persons and groups, new vulnerabilities and advanced new attacks against information systems create risk of cybersecurity incidents. These incidents can include, but are not limited to, gaining unauthorized access to digital systems for purposes of misappropriating assets or sensitive information, corrupting data, or causing operational disruption. Because the techniques used to obtain unauthorized access, disable or degrade service, or sabotage systems change frequently and may not immediately produce signs of intrusion, we may be unable to anticipate these incidents or techniques, timely discover them, or implement adequate preventative measures. These threats can come from a variety of sources, ranging in sophistication from an individual hacker to malfeasance by employees, consultants or other service providers to state sponsored attacks. Cyber threats may be generic, or they may be custom crafted against our information systems. Over the past several years, cyber attacks have become more prevalent and much harder to detect and defend against. Our ne2rk and storage applications, as well as those of our contractors, may be vulnerable to cyber attack, malicious intrusion, malfeasance, loss of data privacy or other significant disruption and may be subject to unauthorized access by hackers, employees, consultants or other service providers. In addition, hardware, software or applications we develop or procure from third parties may contain defects in design or manufacture or other problems that could unexpectedly compromise information security. Unauthorized parties may also attempt to gain access to our systems or facilities through fraud, trickery or other forms of deceiving our employees, contractors and temporary staff. There can be no assurance that we will not be subject to cybersecurity incidents that bypass our security measures, impact the integrity, availability or privacy of personal health information or other data subject to privacy laws or disrupt our information systems, devices or business, including our ability to deliver services to our customers. As a result, cybersecurity, physical security and the continued development and enhancement of our controls, processes and practices designed to protect our enterprise, information systems and data from attack, damage or unauthorized access remain a priority for us. As cyber threats continue to evolve, we may be required to expend significant additional resources to continue to modify or enhance our protective measures or to investigate and remediate any cybersecurity vulnerabilities. The occurrence of any of these events could result in harm to customers; business interruptions and delays; the loss, misappropriation, corruption or unauthorized access of data; litigation, including potential class action litigation, and potential liability under privacy, security and consumer protection laws or other applicable laws; reputational damage; increase to insurance premiums; and foreign, federal and state governmental inquiries, any of which could have a material, adverse effect on our financial position and results of operations and harm our business reputation. 44 Failure to protect our information technology infrastructure against cyber based attacks, ne2rk security breaches, service interruptions, or data corruption could significantly disrupt our operations and adversely affect our business and operating results. We rely on information technology and teleph1 ne2rks and systems, including the Internet, to process and transmit sensitive electronic information and to manage or support a variety of business processes and activities, including sales, billing, customer service, procurement and supply chain, manufacturing, and distribution. We use enterprise information technology systems to record, process, and summarize financial information and results of operations for internal reporting purposes and to comply with regulatory financial reporting, legal, and tax requirements. Our information technology systems, some of which are managed by third parties, may be susceptible to damage, disruptions or shutdowns due to computer viruses, ransomware or other malware, attacks by computer hackers, failures during the process of upgrading or replacing software, databases or comp1nts thereof, power outages, hardware failures, telecommunication failures, user errors or catastrophic events. Although we have developed systems and processes that are designed to protect customer information and prevent data loss and other security breaches, including systems and processes designed to reduce the impact of a security breach at a third party vendor, such measures cannot provide absolute security. If our systems are breached or suffer severe damage, disruption or shutdown and we are unable to effectively resolve the issues in a timely manner, our business and operating results may significantly suffer and we may be subject to litigation, government enforcement actions and other actions for which we could face financial liability and other adverse consequences which may include additional government oversight of our operations; loss of existing customers; difficulty in attracting new customers; problems in determining product cost estimates and establishing appropriate pricing; difficulty in preventing, detecting, and controlling fraud; disputes with customers, physicians, and other health care professionals; increases in operating expenses, incurrence of expenses, including remediation costs; loss of revenues (including through loss of coverage or reimbursement); product development delays; disruption of key business operations; and diversion of attention of management and key information technology resources. The failure to comply with U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act and similar worldwide anti bribery laws in non U.S. jurisdictions could materially adversely affect our business and result in civil and or criminal sanctions. The U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, the UK Bribery Act and similar worldwide anti bribery laws in non U.S. jurisdictions generally prohibit companies and their intermediaries from making improper payments to non U.S. government officials and, in some instances, other persons for the purpose of obtaining or retaining business. Because of the predominance of government sponsored healthcare systems around the world, most of our customer relationships outside of the United States are with governmental entities and are therefore potentially subject to such anti bribery laws. Global enforcement of anti corruption laws has increased substantially in recent years, with more frequent voluntary self disclosures by companies, aggressive investigations and enforcement proceedings by U.S. and foreign governmental agencies, and assessment of significant fines and penalties against companies and individuals. Our international operations create the risk of unauthorized payments or offers of payments by 1 of our employees, consultants, sales agents, or distributors, because these parties are not always subject to our direct oversight and control. It is our policy to implement safeguards to educate our employees and agents on these legal requirements and discourage improper practices. However, our existing safeguards and any future improvements may prove to be less than effective, and our employees, consultants, sales agents, or distributors may engage in conduct for which we might be held responsible. In addition, the government agencies may seek to hold us liable for successor liability for anti corruption law violations committed by any companies in which we invest or that we acquire. Any alleged or actual violations of these regulations may subject us to government scrutiny, severe criminal or civil sanctions and other liabilities, including exclusion from government contracting, and could disrupt our business, and result in a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. The majority of our operations are conducted at facilities in San Diego, California and Mesa, Arizona. Any disruption at these facilities could increase our expenses. We take precautions to safeguard our facilities, which include manufacturing protocols, insurance, health and safety protocols, and off site storage of data. However, a natural or man made disaster, such as fire, flood, earthquake, act of 45 terrorism, cyber attack or other disruptive event could cause substantial delays in our operations, damage or destroy our manufacturing equipment, inventory, or records and cause us to incur additional expenses. Earthquakes are of particular significance since our primary manufacturing facilities in California are located in an earthquake pr1 area. In the event our existing manufacturing facilities or equipment are affected by man made or natural disasters, we may be unable to manufacture products for sale or meet customer demands or sales projections. If our manufacturing operations were curtailed or ceased, it would seriously harm our business. The insurance we maintain against fires, floods, earthquakes and other natural disasters and similar events may not be adequate to cover our losses in any particular case. Continued expansion of our operations in our facility in Mesa may not be scaled at a pace sufficient to ensure that we can manufacture 1 or more of our continuous glucose monitoring products in quantities sufficient to meet market demand. Our facility in Mesa, Arizona is designed to manufacture current and next generation sensors and transmitters, but may not be scaled quickly enough to permit us to manufacture 1 or more of our CGM products in quantities sufficient to meet market demand. There are risks associated with continued expansion of our manufacturing capacity in Mesa that include but are not limited to contractor issues and delays, licensing and permitting delays or rejections, limitations and delays on the installation of new or custom ordered equipment, issues associated with validating such equipment, and processes or other aspects of ensuring we manufacture our products in compliance with current Good Manufacturing Practice requirements. Our products may not continue to achieve market acceptance. We expect that sales of our G4 PLATINUM system, which consists of a handheld receiver, reusable transmitter and disposable sensor, and our G5 Mobile and G6 systems, which consist of a handheld receiver, reusable transmitter, disposable sensors and a smartph1 application that securely identifies, receives, deciphers and displays information transmitted by the transmitter, will account for substantially all of our product revenue for the foreseeable future. If and when we receive FDA or other regulators approval for and begin commercialization of our next generation continuous glucose monitoring systems and sensors, we expect most patients will migrate onto those systems. Notwithstanding our prior experience in selling our products, we might be unable to successfully expand the commercialization of our products on a wide scale for a number of reasons, including the FDA authorization to market our G6 system in the United States in March 2018 means that we have limited experience selling our G6 system; our G6 system prompts the user to replace the sensor no later than the tenth day, which might make it more expensive for users; widespread market acceptance of our products by physicians and people with diabetes will largely depend on our ability to demonstrate their relative safety, effectiveness, reliability, cost effectiveness and ease of use; the limited size of our sales force; we may not have sufficient financial or other resources to adequately expand the commercialization efforts for our products; our FDA and other regulatory reviews and or submissions may be delayed, or approved with limited product labeling; we may not be able to manufacture our products in commercial quantities or at an acceptable cost; people with diabetes do not generally receive broad reimbursement from third party payors for their purchase of CGM products since many payors require that a policy holder meet specific medical criteria to qualify for reimbursement, which may reduce widespread access to or use of our products; the uncertainties associated with establishing and qualifying new manufacturing facilities; people with diabetes will need to incur the costs of our systems in addition to single point finger stick devices; the relative immaturity of the continuous glucose monitoring market internationally, and the general absence of international reimbursement of continuous glucose monitoring devices by third party payors and government healthcare providers outside the United States; the introduction and market acceptance of competing products and technologies; our inability to obtain sufficient quantities of supplies at appropriate quality levels from our single source and other key suppliers; our inability to manufacture products that perform in accordance with expectations of consumers; and rapid technological change may make our technology and our products obsolete. 46 In addition to the risks outlined above, the G6 has improved performance and is being adopted more quickly than anticipated. There is the risk that consumers will stop purchasing our G4 PLATINUM or G5 Mobile systems in preference for the G6, or that regulatory authorities will determine that the G4 PLATINUM or G5 Mobile systems are not as effective as the G6 and may change marketing approval, reimbursement or the extent of coverage for these products. Our G4 PLATINUM, G5 Mobile and G6 systems are more invasive than many other self monitored glucose testing systems, including single point finger stick devices, and people with diabetes may be unwilling to insert a sensor in their body, especially if their current diabetes management involves no more than 2 finger sticks per day. Moreover, people with diabetes may not perceive the benefits of continuous glucose monitoring and may be unwilling to change their current treatment regimens. In addition, physicians tend to be slow to change their medical treatment practices because of perceived liability risks arising from the use of new products. Physicians may not recommend or prescribe our products unless and until (i) there is more long term clinical evidence to convince them to alter their existing treatment methods, (ii) there are additional recommendations from prominent physicians that our products are effective in monitoring glucose levels and (iii) reimbursement or insurance coverage is more widely available. We cannot predict when, if ever, physicians and people with diabetes may adopt more widespread use of continuous glucose monitoring systems, including our systems. If our systems do not achieve and maintain an adequate level of acceptance by people with diabetes, physicians and healthcare payors, we may not generate significant product revenue and we may not become profitable. Current uncertainty in global economic and political conditions makes it particularly difficult to predict product demand and other related matters and makes it more likely that our actual results could differ materially from expectations. Our operations and performance depend on worldwide economic and political conditions. These conditions have been adversely impacted by continued global economic uncertainty, political instability and military hostilities in multiple geographies, concerns over the potential downgrade of U.S. sovereign debt and continued sovereign debt, m1tary and financial uncertainties in Europe and other foreign countries. These include potential reductions in the overall stability and suitability of the Euro as a single currency, given the economic and political challenges facing individual Euroz1 countries. These conditions have made and may continue to make it difficult for our customers and potential customers to afford our products, and could cause our customers to stop using our products or to use them less frequently. If that were to occur, our revenue may decrease and our performance may be negatively impacted. In addition, the pressure on consumers to absorb more of their own health care costs has resulted in some cases in higher deductibles and limits on durable medical equipment, which may cause seasonality in purchasing patterns. Furthermore, during economic uncertainty, our customers have had job losses and may continue to have issues gaining timely access to sufficient health insurance or credit, which could result in their unwillingness to purchase products or impair their ability to make timely payments to us. We cannot predict the reoccurrence of any economic slowdown or the strength or sustainability of the economic recovery, worldwide, in the United States, or in our industry. These and other economic factors could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. We depend on clinical investigators and clinical sites to enroll patients in our clinical trials and other third parties to manage the trials and to perform related data collection and analysis, and, as a result, we may face costs and delays that are outside of our control. We rely on clinical investigators and clinical sites to enroll patients in our clinical trials, and other third parties to manage the trial and to perform related data collection and analysis. However, we may not be able to control the amount and timing of resources that clinical sites may devote to our clinical trials. If these clinical investigators and clinical sites fail to enroll a sufficient number of patients in our clinical trials or fail to ensure compliance by patients with clinical protocols or fail to comply with regulatory requirements, we will be unable to complete these trials, which could prevent us from obtaining regulatory approvals for our products. Our agreements with clinical investigators and clinical sites for clinical testing place substantial responsibilities on these parties and, if these parties fail to perform as expected, our trials could be delayed or terminated. If these clinical investigators, clinical sites or other third parties do not carry out their contractual duties or obligations or fail to meet expected deadlines, or if the quality or accuracy of the clinical data they obtain is compromised due to their failure to adhere to our clinical protocols, regulatory requirements or for other reasons, our clinical trials may be extended, delayed or terminated, or the clinical data may be rejected by the FDA, and we may be unable to obtain regulatory approval for, or successfully commercialize, our products. We may be liable for contamination or other harm caused by materials that we handle, and changes in environmental regulations could cause us to incur additional expense. Our research and development and clinical processes involve the handling of potentially harmful biological materials as well as hazardous materials. We are subject to international and domestic (including federal, state and local) laws, rules and regulations governing the use, handling, storage and disposal of hazardous and biological materials and we incur expenses relating to compliance with these laws and regulations. If violations of environmental, health and safety laws occur, we could 47 be held liable for damages, penalties and costs of remedial actions. These expenses or this liability could have a significant negative impact on our financial condition. We may violate environmental, health and safety laws in the future as a result of human error, equipment failure or other causes. Environmental laws could become more stringent over time, imposing greater compliance costs and increasing risks and penalties associated with violations. We are subject to potentially conflicting and changing regulatory agendas of political, business and environmental groups. Changes to or restrictions on permitting requirements or processes, hazardous or biological material storage or handling might require an unplanned capital investment or relocation. Failure to comply with new or existing laws or regulations could harm our business, financial condition and results of operations. We are subject to a variety of risks due to our international operations that could adversely affect our business, our operations or profitability and operating results. Our operations in countries outside the United States, which accounted for approximately 21% of our revenues for the twelve months ended December 31, 2018 , are accompanied by certain financial and other risks. In addition to opening offices in the United Kingdom, Germany, Canada, and the Philippines, in connection with distributor acquisitions and otherwise, we intend to continue to pursue growth opportunities in sales outside the United States, especially in Europe and Asia (including Japan and Korea), and we may increase our use of administrative and support functions from locations outside the United States, which could expose us to greater risks associated with our sales and operations. As we pursue opportunities outside the United States, we may become more exposed to these risks and our ability to scale our operations effectively may be affected. Additionally, we may experience difficulties in scaling these functions from locations outside the United States and may not experience the expected cost efficiencies. Our profitability and international operations are, and will continue to be, subject to a number of risks and potential costs, including local product preferences and product requirements; longer term receivables than are typical in the United States; fluctuations in foreign currency exchange rates; less intellectual property protection in some countries outside the United States than exists in the United States; trade protection measures and import and export licensing requirements; workforce instability; fluctuations in trade policy and tariff regulations; political and economic instability; and the potential payment of U.S. income taxes on certain earnings of our subsidiaries outside the United States upon repatriation. While it is impossible for us to predict whether these and other proposals will be implemented, or how they will ultimately impact us, they may materially impact our results of operations if, for example, our profits earned abroad are subject to U.S. income tax, or we are otherwise disallowed deductions as a result of these profits. As another example, changes in foreign currency exchange rates may reduce the reported value of our foreign currency denominated revenues, expenses, and cash flows. We cannot predict changes in currency exchange rates, the impact of exchange rate changes, nor the degree to which we will be able to manage the impact of currency exchange rate changes. As a final example, on June 23, 2016, the United Kingdom, or U.K., held a referendum in which voters approved an exit from the European Union, commonly referred to as Brexit. As a result of the referendum, the U.K. government is negotiating the terms of the U.K. future relationship with the European Union. Although it is unknown what those terms will be, it is possible that there will be greater restrictions on imports and exports and on the movement of people between the U.K. and European Union countries, and increased regulatory complexities. Failure to obtain any required regulatory authorization in foreign jurisdictions will prevent us from marketing our products abroad. We conduct limited commercial and marketing efforts in Canada, Europe, Australia, New Zealand, Asia, Latin America, the Middle East and Africa with respect to our continuous glucose monitoring systems and may seek to market our products in other regions in the future. Outside the United States, we can market a product only if we receive a marketing authorization and, in some cases, pricing approval, from the appropriate regulatory authorities. The authorization and or approval procedure varies among countries and can involve additional testing, and the time required to obtain any required authorization or approval may differ from that required to obtain FDA marketing authorization(s). The foreign regulatory authorization or 48 approval process may include all of the risks associated with obtaining FDA marketing authorization(s) in addition to other risks. We may not obtain foreign regulatory authorizations or approvals on a timely basis, if at all. Obtaining a marketing authorization from the FDA does not ensure authorization or approval by regulatory authorities in other countries, and authorization or approval by 1 foreign regulatory authority does not ensure authorization or approval by regulatory authorities in other foreign countries or by the FDA . In addition, in order to obtain the authorization to market our products in certain foreign jurisdictions, we may need to obtain a Certificate to Foreign Government from the FDA . The FDA may refuse to issue a Certificate to Foreign Government in certain instances, including without limitation, during the pendency of any outstanding warning letter. As a result, we may not be able to file for regulatory approvals or marketing authorizations and may not receive necessary approvals or authorizations to commercialize our products in any market outside the United States on a timely basis, or at all. Our success will depend on our ability to attract and retain our personnel, while controlling labor costs. We depend to a significant degree on our senior management, especially Kevin Sayer, our President and Chief Executive Officer. Our success will depend on our ability to retain our senior management and to attract and retain qualified personnel in the future, including sales persons, scientists, clinicians, engineers and other highly skilled personnel. Competition for senior management personnel, as well as sales persons, scientists, clinicians and engineers, is intense and we may not be able to retain our personnel. The loss of the services of members of our senior management, scientists, clinicians or engineers could prevent the implementation and completion of our objectives, including the commercialization of our current products and the development and introduction of additional products. The loss of a member of our senior management or our professional staff would require the remaining executive officers to divert immediate and substantial attention to seeking a replacement. Each of our officers may terminate their employment at any time without notice and without cause or good reason. Additionally, volatility or a lack of positive performance in our stock price may adversely affect our ability to retain key employees. We expect to continue to expand our operations and grow our research and development, manufacturing, sales and marketing, product development and administrative operations. We expect this expansion to place a significant strain on our management and it will require hiring a significant number of qualified personnel. Accordingly, recruiting and retaining such personnel will be critical to our success. There is intense competition from other companies and research and academic institutions for qualified personnel in the areas of our activities. If we fail to identify, attract, retain and motivate these skilled personnel, we may be unable to continue our development and commercialization activities. We may undertake a reorganization of our workforce, which may result in a temporary reduction in the number of employees in certain locations. We would undertake a reorganization to reduce operating expenses, though we cannot guarantee any specific amount of long term cost savings. Further, the turnover in our employee base could result in operational and administrative inefficiencies, which could adversely impact the results of our operations, stock price and customer relationships, and could make recruiting for future management and other positions more difficult. We may require additional funding to continue the commercialization of our G4 PLATINUM, G5 Mobile and G6 systems, or the development and commercialization of our future generation and other continuous glucose monitoring systems, including our sensor augmented insulin pump systems developed in collaboration with our pump partners and other partners. Our operations have consumed substantial amounts of cash since inception. We expect to continue to spend substantial amounts on commercialization of our products, including growth of our manufacturing capacity, and on research and development, including conducting clinical trials for our next generation ambulatory continuous glucose monitoring sensors and systems. Although we raised $389.0 million in net proceeds through the private sale of our convertible notes in June 2017, $75.0 million of which was used to repay our credit facility, $836.6 million in net proceeds through the private sale of our convertible notes in November 2018, $100.0 million of which we used to purchase shares of our common stock, and now have $195.6 million available to us under our credit facility (as reduced by our outstanding letters of credit), we may need funds to continue the commercialization of our current products and to develop and commercialize our next generation sensors and systems. Additional financing may not be available on a timely basis on terms acceptable to us, or at all. Any additional financing may be dilutive to stockholders or may require us to grant a lender a security interest in our assets. The amount of funding we may need will depend on many factors, including the revenue generated by sales of our products and other future products; the costs, timing and risks of delay of additional regulatory approvals; the expenses we incur in manufacturing, developing, selling and marketing our products; our ability to scale our manufacturing operations to meet demand for our current and any future products; the costs to produce our continuous glucose monitoring systems; 49 the costs of filing, prosecuting, defending and enforcing any patent claims and other intellectual property rights; the rate of progress and cost of our clinical trials and other development activities; the success of our research and development efforts; the emergence of competing or complementary technologies; the terms and timing of any collaborative, licensing and other arrangements that we may establish; the cost of ongoing compliance with legal and regulatory requirements, and third party payors policies; the cost of obtaining and maintaining regulatory or payor clearance or approval for our current or future products including those integrated with other companies products; and the acquisition of business, products and technologies, although we currently have no commitments or agreements relating to any of these types of transactions. If adequate funds are not available, we may not be able to commercialize our products at the rate we desire and we may have to delay development or commercialization of our products or license to third parties the rights to commercialize products or technologies that we would otherwise seek to commercialize. We also may have to reduce sales, marketing, customer support or other resources devoted to our products. Any of these factors could harm our business and financial condition. We may face risks associated with acquisitions of companies, products and technologies and our business could be harmed if we are unable to address these risks. If we are presented with appropriate opportunities, we could acquire or make other investments in complementary companies, products or technologies. We may not realize the anticipated benefit of our acquisitions, or the realization of the anticipated benefits may require greater expenditures than anticipated by us. We will likely face risks, uncertainties and disruptions associated with the integration process, including difficulties in the integration of the operations and services of any acquired company, integration of acquired technology with our products, diversion of our management attention from other business concerns, the potential loss of key employees or customers of the acquired businesses and impairment charges if future acquisitions are not as successful as we originally anticipate. If we fail to successfully integrate other companies, products or technologies that we acquire, our business could be harmed. Furthermore, we may have to incur debt or issue equity or equity linked securities to pay for any future acquisitions or investments, the issuance of which could be dilutive to our existing stockholders. In addition, our operating results may suffer because of acquisition related costs or amortization expenses or charges relating to acquired intangible assets. Compliance with regulations relating to public company corporate governance matters and reporting is time consuming and expensive. Many laws and regulations, notably those adopted in connection with the Sarbanes Oxley Act of 2002, the Dodd Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act, new SEC regulations and The Nasdaq Stock Market listing rules, impose obligations on public companies, such as ours, which have increased the scope, complexity and cost of corporate governance, reporting and disclosure practices. Compliance with these laws and regulations, including enhanced new disclosures, has required and will continue to require substantial management time and oversight and the incurrence of significant accounting and legal costs. The effects of new laws and regulations remain unclear and will likely require substantial management time and oversight and require us to incur significant additional accounting and legal costs. Additionally, changes to existing accounting rules or standards, such as the potential requirement that U.S. registrants prepare financial statements in accordance with International Financial Reporting Standards, may adversely impact our reported financial results and business, and may require us to incur greater accounting fees. If we are unable to successfully maintain effective internal control over financial reporting, investors may lose confidence in our reported financial information and our stock price and our business may be adversely impacted. As a public company, we are required to maintain internal control over financial reporting and our management is required to evaluate the effectiveness of our internal control over financial reporting as of the end of each fiscal year. If we are not successful in maintaining effective internal control over financial reporting, there could be inaccuracies or omissions in the consolidated financial information we are required to file with the SEC. Additionally, even if there are no inaccuracies or omissions, we will be required to publicly disclose the conclusion of our management that our internal control over financial reporting or disclosure controls and procedures are not effective. These events could cause investors to lose confidence in our reported financial information, adversely impact our stock price, result in increased costs to remediate any deficiencies, attract regulatory scrutiny or lawsuits that could be costly to resolve and distract management attention, limit our ability to access the capital markets or cause our stock to be delisted from The Nasdaq Stock Market or any other securities exchange on which it is then listed. 50 We could be subject to changes in our tax rates, new U.S. or international tax legislation or additional tax liabilities. We are subject to taxes in the United States and numerous foreign jurisdictions, where a number of our subsidiaries are organized. Due to economic and political conditions, tax rates in various jurisdictions may be subject to change. Our effective tax rates could be affected by numerous factors, including changes in the mix of earnings in countries with differing statutory tax rates, changes in the valuation of deferred tax assets and liabilities, and changes in tax laws or their interpretation, both in and outside the United States. The U.S. government has recently enacted comprehensive tax legislation that includes significant changes to the taxation of business entities. These changes include, among others, (i) a permanent reduction to the corporate income tax rate, (ii) a partial limitation on the deductibility of business interest expense, (iii) a shift of the U.S. taxation of multinational corporations from a tax on worldwide income to a territorial system (along with certain rules designed to prevent erosion of the U.S. income tax base) and (iv) a 1 time tax on accumulated offshore earnings held in cash and illiquid assets, with the latter taxed at a lower rate. The overall impact of this tax reform is uncertain, and our business and financial condition could be adversely affected. In addition, it is uncertain if and to what extent various states will conform to the newly enacted federal tax law. Our tax returns and other tax matters also are subject to examination by the U.S. Internal Revenue Service and other tax authorities and governmental bodies. We regularly assess the likelihood of an adverse outcome resulting from these examinations to determine the adequacy of our provision for taxes. We cannot guarantee the outcome of these examinations. If our effective tax rates were to increase, particularly in the United States, or if the ultimate determination of our taxes owed is for an amount in excess of amounts previously accrued, our financial condition, operating results and cash flows could be adversely affected. Valuation of share based payments, which we are required to perform for purposes of recording compensation expense under authoritative guidance for share based payment, involves assumptions that are subject to change and difficult to predict. We record compensation expense in the consolidated statement of operations for share based payments, such as employee stock options, restricted stock units and employee stock purchase plan shares, using the fair value method. The requirements of the authoritative guidance for share based payment have and will continue to have a material effect on our future financial results reported under U.S. GAAP and make it difficult for us to accurately predict the impact on our future financial results. For instance, estimating the fair value of share based payments is highly dependent on assumptions regarding the future exercise behavior of our employees and changes in our stock price. If there are errors in our input assumptions for our valuations models, we may inaccurately calculate actual or estimated compensation expense for share based payments. The authoritative guidance for share based payment could also adversely impact our ability to provide accurate guidance on our future financial results as assumptions that are used to estimate the fair value of share based payments are based on estimates and judgments that may differ from period to period. We may also be unable to accurately predict the amount and timing of the recognition of tax benefits associated with share based payments as they are highly dependent on the exercise behavior of our employees and the price of our stock relative to the exercise price of each outstanding stock option. For those reasons, among others, the authoritative guidance for share based payment may create variability and uncertainty in the share based compensation expense we will record in future periods, which could adversely impact our stock price and increase our expected stock price volatility as compared to prior periods. Changes in financial accounting standards or practices or existing taxation rules or practices may cause adverse unexpected revenue and or expense fluctuations and affect our reported results of operations. A change in accounting standards or practices or a change in existing taxation rules or practices can have a significant effect on our reported results and may even affect our reporting of transactions completed before the change is effective. New accounting pronouncements and taxation rules and varying interpretations of accounting pronouncements and taxation practice have occurred and may occur in the future. The method in which we market and sell our products may have an impact on the manner in which we recognize revenue. In addition, changes to existing rules or the questioning of current practices may adversely affect our reported financial results or the way we conduct our business. Additionally, changes to existing accounting rules or standards, such as the potential requirement that U.S. registrants prepare financial statements in accordance with International Financial Reporting Standards, may adversely impact our reported financial results and business, and may further require us to incur greater accounting fees. The SEC conflict minerals rule has caused us to incur additional expenses, could limit the supply and increase the cost of certain metals used in manufacturing our products, and could make us less competitive in our target markets. We are required to disclose information related to the origin, source and chain of custody of specified minerals, known as conflict minerals, that are necessary to the functionality or production of products manufactured or contracted to be 51 manufactured. The requirement mandates companies to obtain sourcing data from suppliers, engage in supply chain due diligence, and file annually with the SEC a specialized disclosure report on Form SD covering the prior calendar year. The rule could limit our ability to source at competitive prices and to secure sufficient quantities of certain minerals (or derivatives thereof) used in the manufacture of our products, specifically tantalum, tin, gold and tungsten, as the number of suppliers that provide conflict free minerals may be limited. In addition, we have incurred, and may continue to incur, material costs associated with complying with the rule, such as costs related to the determination of the origin, source and chain of custody of the minerals used in our products, the adoption of conflict minerals related governance policies, processes and controls, and possible changes to products or sources of supply as a result of such activities. Within our supply chain, we may not be able to sufficiently verify the origins of the relevant minerals used in our products through the data collection and due diligence procedures that we implement, which may harm our reputation. Furthermore, we may encounter challenges in satisfying those customers that require that all of the comp1nts of our products be certified as conflict free, and if we cannot satisfy these customers, they may choose a competitor products. Risks Related to Our Common Stock Our stock price is highly volatile and investing in our stock involves a high degree of risk, which could result in substantial losses for investors. Historically, the market price of our common stock, like the securities of many other medical products companies, fluctuates and could continue to be volatile in the future. From January 1, 2018 through February 15, 2019 , the closing price of our common stock on the Nasdaq Global Select Market was as high as $15273 per share and as low as $5225 per share. The market price of our common stock is influenced by many factors that are beyond our control, including the following securities analyst coverage or lack of coverage of our common stock or changes in their estimates of our financial performance; variations in quarterly operating results; future sales of our common stock by our stockholders; investor perception of us and our industry; announcements by us or our competitors of significant agreements, acquisitions, or capital commitments or product launches or discontinuations; changes in market valuation or earnings of our competitors; negative business or financial announcements regarding our partners; general economic conditions; regulatory actions; legislation and political conditions; and terrorist acts. Please also refer to the factors described elsewhere in this Risk Factors section. In addition, the stock market in general has experienced extreme price and volume fluctuations that have often been unrelated and disproportionate to the operating performance of companies in our industry. These broad market and industry factors may materially reduce the market price of our common stock, regardless of our operating performance. Securities class action litigation has often been brought against public companies that experience periods of volatility in the market prices of their securities. Securities class action litigation could result in substantial costs and a diversion of our management attention and resources. If our financial performance fails to meet the expectations of investors and public market analysts, the market price of our common stock could decline. Our revenues and operating results may fluctuate significantly from quarter to quarter. We believe that period to period comparisons of our operating results may not be meaningful and should not be relied on as an indication of our future performance. If quarterly revenues or operating results fall below the expectations of investors or public market analysts, the trading price of our common stock could decline substantially. Factors that might cause quarterly fluctuations in our operating results include our inability to manufacture an adequate supply of product at appropriate quality levels and acceptable costs; possible delays in our research and development programs or in the completion of any clinical trials; a lack of acceptance of our products in the marketplace by physicians and people with diabetes; 52 the inability of customers to receive reimbursements from third party payors; failures to comply with regulatory requirements, which could lead to withdrawal of products from the market; our failure to continue the commercialization of any of our continuous glucose monitoring systems; competition; inadequate financial and other resources; and global and political economic conditions, political instability and military hostilities. Failure to comply with covenants in our revolving credit agreement with JPMorgan Chase Bank and other syndicate lenders could result in our inability to borrow additional funds and adversely impact our business. We have entered into a revolving credit agreement and a pledge and security agreement with JPMorgan Chase Bank and four other lenders to fund our business operations. These agreements impose numerous financial and other restrictive covenants on our operations, including covenants relating to our general profitability and our liquidity. As of December 31, 2018 , we were in compliance with the covenants imposed by the loan and security agreement. If we violate these or any other covenants, any outstanding amounts under these agreements could become due and payable prior to their stated maturity dates, each lender could proceed against any collateral in our operating accounts and our ability to borrow funds in the future may be restricted or eliminated. These restrictions may also limit our ability to borrow additional funds and pursue other business opportunities or strategies that we would otherwise consider to be in our best interests. Increasing our financial leverage could affect our operations and profitability . The current maximum available credit under our multi currency revolving credit facility is $200.0 million . Our leverage ratio may affect the availability to us of additional capital resources as well as our operations in several ways, including the terms on which credit may be available to us could be less attractive, both in the economic terms of the credit and the legal covenants; the possible lack of availability of additional credit; the potential for higher levels of interest expense to service or maintain our outstanding debt; the possibility of additional borrowings in the future to repay our indebtedness when it comes due; and the possible diversion of capital resources from other uses. While we believe we will have the ability to service our debt and obtain additional resources in the future if and when needed, that will depend upon our results of operations and financial position at the time, the then current state of the credit and financial markets, and other factors that may be beyond our control. Therefore, we cannot give assurances that sufficient credit will be available on terms that we consider attractive, or at all, if and when necessary or beneficial to us. The issuance of shares by us in the future or sales of shares by our stockholders may cause the market price of our common stock to drop significantly, even if our business is performing well. This issuance of shares by us in the future, including by conversion of our convertible notes in certain circumstances, the issuance of shares of our common stock to partners, including up to 2,025,036 shares of our common stock that we may issue to Verily and Onduo LLC pursuant to the Restated Collaboration Agreement, or sales of shares by our stockholders may cause the market price of our common stock to decline, perhaps significantly, even if our business is performing well. The market price of our common stock could also decline if there is a perception that sales of our shares are likely to occur in the future. This might also make it more difficult for us to sell equity securities in the future at a time and at a price that we deem appropriate. Also, we may issue securities in connection with future financings and acquisitions, and those shares could dilute the holdings of other stockholders. We do not intend to pay dividends for the foreseeable future. We have never declared or paid cash dividends on our capital stock. We currently intend to retain any future earnings to finance the operation and expansion of our business, and we do not expect to declare or pay any dividends in the foreseeable future and the terms of our credit agreement restrict our ability to declare or pay dividends. As a result, stockholders (including holders of our convertible notes who receive shares of our common stock, if any, upon conversion of their notes) may only receive a return on their investment in our common stock if the market price of our common stock increases. 53 Anti takeover effects of our charter documents and Delaware law could make a merger, tender offer or proxy contest difficult, thereby depressing the trading price of our common stock. In addition, there are provisions in our certificate of incorporation and bylaws, as well as provisions in the Delaware General Corporation Law, that may discourage, delay or prevent a change of control that might otherwise be beneficial to stockholders. For example our Board of Directors may, without stockholder approval, issue shares of preferred stock with special voting or economic rights; our stockholders do not have cumulative voting rights and, therefore, each of our directors can only be elected by holders of a majority of our outstanding common stock; a special meeting of stockholders may only be called by a majority of our Board of Directors, the Chairman of our Board of Directors, our Chief Executive Officer, our President or our Lead Independent Director; our stockholders may not take action by written consent; our Board of Directors is divided into 3 classes, only 1 of which is elected each year; and we require advance notice for nominations for election to the Board of Directors or for proposing matters that can be acted upon by stockholders at stockholder meetings. Risks Related to Our Debt We have indebtedness in the form of convertible senior notes, which could adversely affect our financial health and our ability to respond to changes in our business. In June 2017, we completed an offering of $400.0 million aggregate principal amount of 0.75% convertible senior notes due 2022, or 2022 Notes, which offering we refer to as the 2017 Notes Offering. In November 2018, we completed an offering of $850.0 million aggregate principal amount of 0.75% convertible senior notes due 2023, or 2023 Notes, which offering we refer to as the 2018 Notes Offering. We refer to the 2017 Notes Offering and the 2018 Notes Offering together as the Notes Offerings, and we refer to the 2022 Notes and the 2023 Notes together as the Notes. As a result of the Notes Offerings, we incurred $1250 billion principal amount of indebtedness, the principal amount of which we may be required to pay at maturity. Holders of the Notes will have the right to require us to repurchase their notes upon the occurrence of a fundamental change (as defined in the indenture for each of the 2022 Notes and the 2023 Notes) at a purchase price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the notes to be purchased, plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any. In addition, each indenture for the Notes provides that we are required to repay amounts due under each indenture in the event that there is an event of default for the Notes that results in the principal, premium, if any, and interest, if any, becoming due prior to maturity date for the Notes. There can be no assurance that we will be able to repay this indebtedness when due, or that we will be able to refinance this indebtedness on acceptable terms or at all. As a result of our level of increased debt after the completion of the Notes Offerings our vulnerability to adverse general economic conditions and competitive pressures will be heightened; we will be required to dedicate a larger portion of our cash flow from operations to interest payments, limiting the availability of cash for other purposes; our flexibility in planning for, or reacting to, changes in our business and industry may be more limited; and our ability to obtain additional financing in the future for working capital, capital expenditures, acquisitions, general corporate purposes or other purposes may be impaired. We cannot be sure that our leverage resulting from the level of increased debt after the completion of the Notes Offerings will not materially and adversely affect our ability to finance our operations or capital needs or to engage in other business activities. In addition, we cannot be sure that additional financing will be available when required or, if available, will be on terms satisfactory to us. Further, even if we are able to obtain additional financing, we may be required to use such proceeds to repay a portion of our debt. 54 We may be unable to repurchase the Notes upon a fundamental change when required by the holders or repay prior to maturity any accelerated amounts due under the notes upon an event of default or redeem the Notes unless specified conditions are met under our credit facility, and our future debt may contain limitations on our ability to pay cash upon conversion, repurchase or repayment of the Notes. Holders of the Notes will have the right to require us to repurchase their Notes upon the occurrence of a fundamental change at a purchase price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the Notes to be purchased, plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, to, but not including, the fundamental change purchase date. In addition, each indenture for the Notes provides that we are required to repay amounts due under each indenture in the event that there is an event of default for the Notes that results in the principal, premium, if any, and interest, if any, becoming due prior to maturity date for the Notes. In addition, upon conversion of the Notes, unless we elect to deliver solely shares of our common stock to settle such conversion (other than cash in lieu of any fractional share), we will be required to make cash payments in respect of the Notes being converted. However, we may not have enough available cash or be able to obtain financing at the time we are required to repurchase Notes surrendered upon a fundamental change or repay prior to maturity any accelerated amounts or pay cash for Notes being converted. In addition, our ability to purchase the Notes or repay prior to maturity any accelerated amounts under the Notes upon an event of default or pay cash upon conversions of the Notes may be limited by law, by regulatory authority or by agreements governing our indebtedness outstanding at the time, including our credit facility. Under our current credit facility we are only permitted to use cash to purchase the Notes or repay prior to maturity any accelerated amounts under the Notes if we meet certain conditions that are defined under the Credit Agreement. We may not meet these conditions in the future. Our failure to repurchase Notes at a time when the repurchase is required by the respective indenture (whether upon a fundamental change or otherwise under each indenture) or pay cash payable on future conversions of the Notes as required by the indenture would constitute a default under each indenture. A default under each indenture or the fundamental change itself could also lead to a default under agreements governing our existing or future indebtedness, including our credit facility. If the repayment of the related indebtedness were to be accelerated after any applicable notice or grace periods, we may not have sufficient funds to repay the indebtedness, repurchase the Notes or make cash payments upon conversions thereof. We may still incur substantially more debt or take other actions which would intensify the risks discussed above. We may incur substantial additional debt in the future, subject to the restrictions contained in our debt instruments, some of which may be secured debt. We are not restricted under the terms of the indentures governing the Notes from incurring additional debt, securing existing or future debt, recapitalizing our debt, or taking a number of other actions that are not limited by the terms of the indenture governing the convertible senior notes that could have the effect of diminishing our ability to make payments on the Notes when due. The convertible note hedge and warrant transactions may affect the value of the 2023 Notes and our common stock. In connection with the sale of the 2023 Notes, we entered into convertible note hedge, or the 2023 Note Hedge, transactions with certain financial institutions, or option counterparties. We also entered into warrant transactions with the option counterparties pursuant to which we sold warrants for the purchase of our common stock, or the 2023 Warrants. The 2023 Note Hedge transactions are expected generally to reduce the potential dilution upon any conversion of the 2023 Notes and or offset any cash payments we are required to make in excess of the principal amount of converted 2023 Notes. The 2023 Warrant transactions could separately have a dilutive effect to the extent that the market price per share of our common stock exceeds the exercise price of the 2023 Warrants, which is $198.38. The option counterparties and or their respective affiliates may modify their hedge positions by entering into or unwinding various derivatives with respect to our common stock and or purchasing or selling our common stock in secondary market transactions prior to the maturity of 2023 Notes (and are likely to do so during any observation period related to a conversion of 2023 Notes, or following any repurchase of Notes by us on any fundamental change repurchase date (as defined in the indenture for the 2023 Notes) or otherwise). This activity could also cause or avoid an increase or a decrease in the market price of our common stock or the 2023 Notes, which could affect note holders ability to convert the 2023 Notes and, to the extent the activity occurs during any observation period related to a conversion of the 2023 Notes, it could affect the amount and value of the consideration that note holders will receive upon conversion of the 2023 Notes. The potential effect, if any, of these transactions and activities on the market price of our common stock or the 2023 Notes will depend in part on market conditions and cannot be ascertained at this time. Any of these activities could adversely affect the value of our common stock and the value of the 2023 Notes (and as a result, the value of the consideration, the amount of cash and or the number of shares, if any, that note holders would receive upon the conversion of the 2023 Notes) and, under certain circumstances, the ability of the note holders to convert the 2023 Notes. We do not make any representation or prediction as to the direction or magnitude of any potential effect that the transactions described above may have on the price of the 2023 Notes or our common stock. In addition, we do not make any 55 representation that the option counterparties will engage in these transactions or that these transactions, once commenced, will not be discontinued without notice. We are subject to counterparty risk with respect to the 2023 Note Hedge transactions. The option counterparties are financial institutions, and we will be subject to the risk that any or all of them may default under the 2023 Note Hedge transactions. Our exposure to the credit risk of the option counterparties will not be secured by any collateral. Recent global economic conditions have resulted in the actual or perceived failure or financial difficulties of many financial institutions. If an option counterparty becomes subject to insolvency proceedings, we will become an unsecured creditor in those proceedings, with a claim equal to our exposure at that time under our transactions with that option counterparty. Our exposure will depend on many factors but, generally, an increase in our exposure will be correlated to an increase in the market price and in the volatility of our common stock. In addition, upon a default by an option counterparty, we may suffer adverse tax consequences and more dilution than we currently anticipate with respect to our common stock. We can provide no assurances as to the financial stability or viability of the option counterparties. Servicing our debt requires a significant amount of cash, and we may not have sufficient cash flow from our business to pay our substantial debt. Our ability to make scheduled payments of the principal of, to pay interest on or to refinance our indebtedness, including the Notes, depends on our future financial condition and operating performance, which is subject to economic, financial, competitive and other factors beyond our control. Our business may not continue to generate cash flow from operations in the future sufficient to satisfy our obligations under the Notes, our existing indebtedness and any future indebtedness we may incur and to make necessary capital expenditures. We may not maintain a level of cash flows from operating activities sufficient to permit us to pay the principal, premium, if any, and interest on (as well as any cash due upon conversion of) our debt, including the Notes. If we are unable to generate such cash flow, we may be required to adopt 1 or more alternatives, such as reducing or delaying investments or capital expenditures, selling assets, refinancing or obtaining additional equity capital on terms that may be 1rous or highly dilutive. These alternative measures may not be successful and may not permit us to meet our scheduled debt servicing obligations. Further, we may need to refinance all or a portion of our debt on or before maturity, and our ability to refinance the Notes, existing indebtedness or future indebtedness will depend on the capital markets and our financial condition at such time. We may not be able to engage in any of these activities on commercially reasonable terms or at all, which could result in a default on the Notes or our current and future indebtedness. Our credit facility imposes restrictions on us that may adversely affect our ability to operate our business. Our credit facility contains restrictive covenants relating to our capital raising activities and other financial and operational matters which may make it more difficult for us to obtain additional capital and to pursue business opportunities, including potential acquisitions. In addition, our credit facility and the agreements governing the notes each contain cross default provisions whereby a default under 1 agreement would likely result in cross defaults under agreements covering other borrowings. For example, the occurrence of a default with respect to any indebtedness or any failure to repay debt when due in an amount in excess of $25.0 million that causes such indebtedness to become due prior to its scheduled maturity date would cause a cross default under the indenture governing the Notes. In addition, the occurrence of a default with respect to any indebtedness or any failure to repay debt when due in an amount in excess of $15.0 million that causes such indebtedness to become due prior to its scheduled maturity date would cause a default under our credit facility. The occurrence of a default under any of these borrowing arrangements would permit the holders of the Notes or the lenders under our credit facility to declare all amounts outstanding under those borrowing arrangements to be immediately due and payable. If the Note holders or the trustee under the indenture governing the Notes or the lenders under our credit facility accelerate the repayment of borrowings, we cannot assure you that we will have sufficient assets to repay those borrowings. Conversion of the Notes will, to the extent we deliver shares upon conversion of such Notes, dilute the ownership interest of existing stockholders, including holders who had previously converted their Notes, or may otherwise depress our stock price. The conversion of some or all of the Notes will dilute the ownership interests of existing stockholders to the extent we deliver shares upon conversion of any of the Notes. Any sales in the public market of the common stock issuable upon such conversion could adversely affect prevailing market prices of our common stock. In addition, the existence of the Notes may encourage short selling by market participants because the conversion of the Notes could be used to satisfy short positions, or anticipated conversion of the Notes into shares of our common stock could depress our stock price. 56 The conditional conversion feature of the Notes, if triggered, may adversely affect our financial condition and operating results. In the event the conditional conversion feature of the Notes is triggered, holders of the Notes will be entitled to convert the Notes at any time during specified periods at their option. If 1 or more holders elect to convert their Notes, unless we elect to satisfy our conversion obligation by delivering solely shares of our common stock (other than cash in lieu of any fractional share), we would be required to settle a portion or all of our conversion obligation through the payment of cash, which could adversely affect our liquidity. In addition, even if holders of the Notes do not elect to convert their Notes, we could be required under applicable accounting rules to reclassify all or a portion of the outstanding principal of the Notes as a current rather than long term liability, which would result in a material reduction of our net working capital. The accounting method for convertible debt securities that may be settled in cash, such as the Notes, may have a material effect on our reported financial results. Under GAAP, an entity must separately account for the debt comp1nt and the embedded conversion option of convertible debt instruments that may be settled entirely or partially in cash upon conversion, such as the Notes, in a manner that reflects the issuer economic interest cost. The effect of the accounting treatment for such instruments is that the value of such embedded conversion option would be treated as original issue discount for purposes of accounting for the debt comp1nt of the Notes, and that original issue discount is amortized into interest expense over the term of the Notes using an effective yield method. As a result, we will be required to record a greater amount of non cash interest expense because of the amortization of the original issue discount to the Notes face amount over the term of the Notes and because of the amortization of the debt issuance costs. Accordingly, we will report greater interest expense and lower net income in our financial results because of the recognition of both the current period amortization of the debt discount and the Notes coupon interest, which could adversely affect our reported or future financial results, the trading price of our common stock and the trading price of the Notes. In addition, if the conditional conversion feature of the Notes is triggered, even if holders do not elect to convert their Notes, we could be required under applicable accounting rules to reclassify all or a portion of the outstanding principal of the Notes as a current rather than long term liability, which would result in a material reduction of our net working capital. The fundamental change repurchase feature of the Notes may delay or prevent an otherwise beneficial attempt to take over DexCom. The terms of the Notes require us to repurchase the Notes in the event of a fundamental change. A takeover of DexCom would trigger an option of the holders of the Notes to require us to repurchase the Notes. In addition, if a make whole fundamental change occurs prior to the maturity date of the Notes, we will in some cases be required to increase the conversion rate for a holder that elects to convert its Notes in connection with such make whole fundamental change. Furthermore, each indenture for the Notes prohibits us from engaging in certain mergers or acquisitions unless, among other things, the surviving entity assumes our obligations under the notes. These and other provisions of each indenture may have the effect of delaying or preventing a takeover of DexCom. ITEM 1B. UNRESOLVED STAFF COMMENTS N1 57 ITEM 2 ITEM 2 PROPERTIES
